I looked at the short bit of roof I still had to climb. It wasn’t far. But it wasn’t like I climbed roofs for a living. I breathed again. My breath surrounding me like a cloud.
Only time will tell if Barcelona can continue the legacy without their leader but also how Guardiola will feel after 12 months off. I suppose we should all just sit back and relax.
His eyes heed well the needed graceful path.
Your Design Team
In my story, none of the animals is too sick to survive. Lauren is able to save all of them, even though they’re taken into custody by LA Animal Services, a public system where overcrowding can result in euthanasia. But even though Lauren doesn’t have room for them all, she has friends running other private shelters, so every one of the animals is picked up and taken to those shelters till they can be adopted.
Hope for the best. Prepare for the worst.
"Pop, get the tomatoes!" she exclaimed.
And then I happened to check the calender today on Disney's site...they changed things around on me.
No neighbor in this village is a stranger
Next request "A dictionary"?
Why I'm Interested:
behind-the-scenes work. “He runs off to Rome every two weeks,” says a local priest who worked in the archdiocese’s office and got to know Rigali when both of them were at the Vatican two decades ago. “His work there is more important to him than here—it’s a terrible thing for the parishioners and clergy.” Many observers believe that the Vatican will soon find someone new to run the
Aren't the colours of his clothes wonderfully hideous? Just how I planned it. Wish I had done a bit more shading on the shirt. I might go back and do that.
There are some conditions to accepting the award. One is to acknowledge and thank, through a link, the blogger who was kind enough to nominate you and to cut and paste the award onto your own page. Another is to pass the award on to other deserving bloggers.
Sue and the other families would disagree. While some of the families have been informed by their adoptive children of the truth behind their adoptions, many of the other children still urge Jonathan to remain quiet. "Don't tell! We were told we can never tell." Thus, there is little doubt that many families of Luoyang's "orphans" don't realize that their child, along with their birth family, really expect that this is simply a "study abroad" program. Already, stories of adoption disruptions and turmoil are being recounted as the children grow frustrated that they are not being given the material gifts that they had been promised. Unfortunately, Luoyang's program is in no way unique, as many orphanages across China have seen similar spikes in "aging out" children needing to be adopted.
The Caravan will end in Tucson with a celebration. Along the way, there are terrific events planned where authors will participate in Teach-Ins. Below is a map of the journey. You can see the detailed schedule here.
Within the last 15 to 20 years, transgender has expanded to become an umbrella term applied to a diverse group of individuals whose gender identity or expression differs from what is culturally associated with one’s sex and gender. While an increasing number of researchers, organizations, and individuals are using the term, its exact definition and usage remains unclear. In order to collect more information, we asked individuals who identified with a gender identity other than, or in addition to, the gender associated with their birth sex to indicate how they self-identify. We also asked questions about participant’s birth sex, age, and desire for hormones or sexual reassignment surgery.
This a pre-order. Estimated to be in stock by late April/early May.
Is it any wonder that membership, participation, and the perception that the church is a relevant institution in today’s world are all way, way down? Something isn’t working. Something isn’t syncing up quite right. Perhaps it’s time for us to look at another model.
‘We could have some type of arrangement though, where I make up some of the difference—I can’t afford all of it—but probably two-thirds.’
Thanks again, Kitty Tube LLC for making Mom’s birthday, and creating a quality shelter for outdoor cats!
Listing price: $100 million completed ($75 million as is)
“They (the terrorists) don’t think of their parents? Their relatives, and all those left behind?” Usman said, his voice rising, exasperated at the thought of how the parents must feel to lose their children thus, at least some parents if not most.
Let’s take a look at how God views homosexuality. As has already been stated, God loves homosexuals. God does not, however, love homosexuality. For instance, God says, “Do not lie with a man as one lies with a woman; that is detestable” (Leviticus 18:22) and “If a man lies with a man as one lies with a woman, both of them have done what is detestable. They must be put to death; their blood will be on their own heads” (Leviticus 20:13). God views homosexuality as “detestable” or, as in the King James version of the Bible, “an abomination”. Notice also that in the Old Testament, the Mosaic law required that people who committed homosexual acts were to be put to death. Of course, no true Christian today would expect a homosexual to be put to death. Christ came to free us from our bondage under the law. However, anyone who tries to assert that homosexuality is not opposed to God’s will, or that homosexuality is okay with God, must go through some severe scriptural contortions to try to prove their point.
But this is a beer blog, so I will write about some of the bars and restaurants in Trondheim. Not far from the cathedral you can find Tulla Fischer. This is a cafe selling among others cakes, sandwiches and pizzas. Once upon a time this was the telegraph building in Trondheim, and the ceiling still has the look of an official building combined with fancy lamps.
The lonely mother,
In conclusion, these events have left me quite mad at how ridiculous these ‘health and safety’ rules are becoming. They do little to protect anyone from any harm, and instead leave everyone feeling rather pissed off!
Yes everyone, the Men In Black franchise is back for the third installment. Director Barry Sonnenfield lagi lagi di percaya buat menyutradarai instalmen ketiga dari Men In Black saga, his work in the first two movies was a success and he certainly has a thing for extra terrestrials.
UPDATE 445pm CDT 4/30/2012 :
Let’s say we accept the basic tenets of the harm prevention argument. What we then need is some principle to plug the gap between intervention and liability. A deterrence argument might be exactly what we need. A deterrence argument will work off the idea that there are certain incentives that make people more likely to respond or behave in a particular way in the future. In many ways, the goal of any social engineer is to craft a network of incentives that encourages people to behave in ways you like, and deters them from behaving in ways you do not like.
******HEY GIRLFRIEND!*****
We wanted 4 buttons in a row so we took the measurement of the full length, which was 55” and divided it by 5 and got 11”.
was released during 2006.
I look up and see him looking at me in his mirror. He nods. Oh!
hehe jk.
Down in Kokomo
Not only did my step-father come through, the dude had a lot to say! There were things he shared with me through the medium that he never could have known. Details. Specifics. Names. Dates. Surprisingly, I wasn't spooked. I just kept listening and taking notes.
Here’s hoping no one gets queasy!
**Make sure to set up your paper in the pattern you desire before adding the letters to ensure you glue to letters in the order of the pattern you choose**
Now, waiting for the last phone call of the day, I take a little moment to answer to this "survey" found on Sweenz's blog !
First of all -- and I can't stress this enough -- the controversy here is not that George Zimmerman has not yet been put in the electric chair. It is not that people are impatient with the "process". It's that the process seems to have, from the start, shown a marked disinterest in the death of a young Black man and all too ready to assume that "he had it coming". We can't be patient for the "process" to work itself out because the "process" never really started. Zimmerman wasn't given a drug or alcohol test (but Martin sure was). The police just took Zimmerman's word that he had a clean record, just as they took his word that he shot in self-defense. Virtually all of the numerous, numerous inconsistencies in Zimmerman's story have emerged not because of diligent police work, but because of media pressure trying to fill in the gaps left by an apathetic police force.
He accuses the three ministers of ‘criminal negligence and irresponsibility because of their lack in intervening. “They are endangering food-security for the entire country by failing to act against illegal mines and other water-pollutors’. One example, he pointed out, was that Sonjica had ‘illegally’ granted a water-license to Vuna Mining – the company belonging to her predecessor’s husband Andrew Hendricks. “This mine lies right in the water-surce of the already seriously polluted Olifants River outside Middelburg in Mpumalanga.
The smile faded off his face, and he felt just as distant with her as he did before the chat. All he could do was start to walk again to his chagrin. They walked a bit in silence; it was neither in his best interest nor nature for Derrek to push the point.
This part of the process can take anywhere from 25-35 minutes to complete.
2. I am a physical therapist who works with special needs kids – True – Satirical leanings and a rapier-like-wit are actually assets in my career. For the record, I also work with adults in other settings. Just to clarify, I would never ridicule one of my patients, but the rest of you dolts are fair game.
3.) The story and world you’ve created is extremely interesting, but it took me just a bit to get familiar with the different phrasings and descriptions for humans and elementals. Can you offer future readers the simplistic way to remember the differences or maybe a crash course in Just Breathe terminology?
-Stat vs. the fire extinguisher case
A splendid August day – by evening Frances rolled from one warm paver to another when called to come in. We stood on the balcony in the dark, looking at stars and moon without shivering, and slept with all the windows open.
under certain circumstances—when we are in unity and not in separation.
O LORD help me to pass my CIPM with Distinction! Take away every distraction along the path to my success and give my victory at the end, to Your glory in Christ Jesus! Amen!
2 Snickers bars, chopped
If I played cricket I think it would be underarm not overarm, that’s just how I throw; like a girl.
Facial Blushing – Causes and Cures
My daffodils are up! Well, three of them are, anyway. That may be all I get this year.
The latest crop circle of July 6th at Danebury Camp, Nether Wallop, Hampshire, illustrated top, might be seen as Pandora’s Box. We are presented on this planet Earth – our only Home – with the greatest gifts Creation can offer in one blue bundle, to be used wisely or scattered to the winds.
“Preparing for Lip Sync has been really fun. I feel like I have bonded a lot with the girls and it has been fun meeting the guys from the fraternities.” – Erica Kim
It also seems like it is a civil rights violation to drag someone outside without giving them the opportunity to pull their pants up. Public humiliation. Which will fly well in a civil court, as all charges were dropped.
Judy knows I love polka dots.
The battle has weakened Maki considerably. There is no guarantee he will be able to regain his superhuman form again and defeat the monster. Nor is it known whether Maki himself might become a danger to humanity should the transformation take place once more.
As an adult I’ve dabbled from time to time with Japanese animation – I own Akira and Ghost in the Shell because you have to own Akira and Ghost in the Shell, and I bought the first Appleseed DVD and remember liking it, but the only anime that I watch and genuinely love are Steamboy, the Cowboy Bebop movie and a bunch of the Miyazaki stuff.
You can combine our challenge with any other challenges and enter as many times as you like as long as each project is different and they are new.
Place the bottom cake part back into the spring form. Pour the chocolate mousse onto the cake. Cover and leave it in the fridge for at least 4 hours. Do not put top cake piece over the mousse as it is still very soft. Cover with plastic wrap and save it until ready to ensemble the cake.
A quick shout-out to all those readers in New South Wales to let you know that The Local Taphouse in Sydney is holding their first Ale Stars session on Tuesday April 7. As regular readers will have guessed this event is one of my extra special favourite things to do that concerns beer and if you are anywhere near the joint on the first Tuesday of the month, get in and have a ball. And a beer. Or four.
I'll also be doing an interview with her on the 25th Feb which is the official day the C-format paperback comes out. I'm sure she will be amenable to any suggestions of questions you'd like her to ask me if you contact her via the comments form on her blog.
I got to campus a little late, but that was okay. Venturing into McAlister Field House, looking for one of the new football posters, I was almost immediately accosted by a gentleman who asked me if I wanted to eat something. He pointed to a long table filled with hamburgers and hot dogs, and it suddenly occurred to me that I was hungry.
Excuse me if my PMT has sent me OTT!
The article goes on to report difficulties in Lady Churchill’s marriage. “Poor Jerome, who like many another American, has learned that the position of father-in-law to an English noble is a position full of difficulties and a small very unsatisfactory share of barren honor.”
She’s right. For now, I am content with who I am, glad to be me, striving to grow and improve my personal best with each life lesson to the point that I will one day leave only happy, joyful memories in my wake.
- Basic Pearls #119247
I had built walls….
This weekend was the big furniture move to my son's new house, so I didn't have any time to play. I have spent most of the week there cleaning, setting up his kitchen and bathrooms and getting things ready for the big move. So all I have is just a fast new tablescape for the coffee table.
Bekah checked her voice mail when she got off work. The caller was Shelah, and she had fantastic news! “Hey, Bekah,” the message went. “This is Shelah. I bet you’re working, darn it! I really wanted to tell you my good news. I got a 4.0! I’m so excited!” After two years’ worth of classes, Shelah will be graduating from Mt. Hood Community College’s cosmetology program with an Associate’s Degree, honors, and an average GPA of 4.0. Of course Bekah had to immediately call Shelah back and congratulate her on her achievements!
You never know what you might be missing.
The drunk wipes his eyes, catches his breath and yells to the preacher, “Are you sure this is where he fell in?”
For years, The Yardbirds' legacy wasn't well tended, it was hard to figure out what albums to get, and even which guitarists were on which album. But in 2001, Rhino combined all the eras of the band's career into one very well annotated collection, The Yardbirds Ultimate! I recommend this so highly. I just listened to the whole thing, and was amazed, once again, by how great this band was. What a tragedy that frontman Keith Relf is no longer with us - a Yardbirds reunion with Beck and Page, with Relf singing, that would have been amazing.
Day 26
As a side note, in writing this post, I had to take a peek at my Inner Realm horoscope, for old time’s sake. I was floored:
Lemon Balm
Also they sell a mixing set tools to mix the inks in well mannered.
I've had a lovely day today at my majorettes bbq and swimming! Was brilliant! Had a GREAT time!!! Sophie x
That got me to thinking about when we call ourselves Christians. Are we doing anything to prove it to others? I don’t mean we all have to hold month long tent revivals in the middle of August every night. However, when people see us, are we reflecting Christ? Are we really, truly, trying to show people we’re Christians? Yes, we must have faith, that is how we’re justified. But we have to work to show people our faith.
- Fruit Amuse of Pluot, Asian Pear, Currant, Wild Flower Honey @ Home
All this shows that I’m moving on, and yet . . .
Yes, the snowman is done! Now all I have to do is stitch the Santa.....
Anyway, I made a layout of me last Saturday. After a while, I felt my skill has become rusty. Without further ado, here is the layout "I promise 2012 is going to be my artsy-craftsy year" ;)
Now I really don't care if you call yourself young at heart because your bust line is now where your waist used to be-----I don't care if you call yourself buxom because you talking bathroom scales yell for one at a time---
Happy New Year, everyone.
The witness testimony is usually taken outside court, in the offices of one of the attorneys or the court reporter.
And realized it was not so much trouble, and a lovely workout! Hey, it was free!! And I got a kick out of free food too!! :)
It's therapy for me too, because I love connecting with you guys!
Left: Hommage à Mozart, 1952,
This month is flying right past, isn't it?
And have fun. Because life merits celebration.
The Bronze Medals went to Pan e Vino for his Crema D'Aragosta Soup, Bino for their Minestrone Soup, and Cubana Cafe for their Chicken Soup with avocado, scallions, and more.
STORY: Agent J of the MIB comes to work one morning to find the world changed and agent K dead for 40 years. Something has changed in the timeline and it is up to J to go back in time and make it right. However, he will find in the past that Agent K of the 60s hadn’t changed much from the guy who drove him crazy in the 21st century.
So my oldest child, he knows how to make me eat humble pie or crow or however you would like to phrase it. And I respect him a little more each time he does it, to be honest.
There’s that quote, “No matter where you are, there are Steelers fans”. Well, that may be true, but it’s true for most teams. The NFL is such a national entity now, thanks to the internet (you have to love radio streaming and real-time box scores) and NFL Sunday Ticket, that you can see every team, everywhere. Kids aren’t growing up with only one or two teams on TV every weekend anymore. I found a Bills Backers chapter in Charleston, South Carolina. The Bills haven’t exactly been world-beaters in the past decade, yet I was still able to find fellow fans and a bar eight hundred miles away from Buffalo. You can basically find fans of every team everywhere, so please stop making your team sound like a national brand that everybody rallies behind (including you, Cowboy fan).
If only today looked like this! It's been raining all day... so sad because I'm so pumped for spring already. So tired of coats!!! It's time I put my fur and wool away for the year.
But O'Keeffe needed new inspiration and in New Mexico she found it, immediately focusing on the church architecture, skulls and crosses that were to provide her with subject matter for decades. Moving permanently to Ghost Ranch, just above Abiquiu, in 1940, she spent forty years evolving into the tough, self-contained old woman who still haunts the region as a kind of desert seer. She lived so long (dying in 1986 at the age of 98) that she seemed as permanent as the mountains and desert she loved, and in Santa Fe everyone over a certain age has a story that begins, 'Did I ever tell you about the time I met Georgia... ?'
The timeline hierarchy of the Flash document.
Jeans - Top Shop
Moreover, the developer knew he couldn’t confine his plans just to the railyards, since an arena wouldn’t fit. Witt explains the expansion using Ratnerian language:
I was having a late night crafting session here...
If you missed the updates at DarkLordDay.com, make sure you head on over there to catch up. There's a lot of very important information on the site. This update and this update in particular.
Here is the game:
Okay, so the word scholar is loosely used here. In the sense of : one seeking knowledge, since I don’t have the complete qualifications, sanad, right length of beard, right lineage peppered with uncles with waist length baardjies and turbans that could double as kafns. But, still, I’ll keep the name.
If you´re not too terribly groggy, the whole process could take about 60 seconds.
*silver brads
Vyomesh Joshi:
In fact the mobiles are leading to serious accidents and fatalities almost daily. Drinking and driving was safer than being on a phone while driving, but we all do it. We daily read of the cases of people being run over by TRAINS, because the people crossing the rail tracks were too busy on their phones. (I hope this happens just in India – but here it does.) And we have not begun speaking about the health hazard from the radiations – the mobile industry sees to it that no clear opinion is formed about the matter. With the increasing number of incidents of cancer in society in the recent years, I would not be surprised if the culprit is the high exposure to mobile radiations.
The new Highveld Horsecare Unit site is more than just a website: it’s a community, a gathering place for like minds and all those who care about the welfare of horses in South Africa; for those who want to contribute in some way, no matter how small, to making their lives better.
Homer: Oh. Well, then just give me a six-pack and a couple of bags of Skittles.
*"Sora" is taken from Sora Ltd., a Nintendo added affair developer founded by Air-conditioned Accident Bros. architect Masahiro Sakurai. "Revolution" and "Nitro" were Nintendo's action names for the Wii and DS prototypes, respectively.
Politically, while a recent NBC/Wall Street Journal poll showed that gay marriage is supported by two-thirds of Democrats, it also showed that only 46 percent of independents favored it. Asking Democrats to endorse gay marriage is, in a sense, a no-brainer, but in an election year, the issue will drive independents to the right, a losing proposition for Democrats and Obama.
In the front yard of a funeral director.
Hey there! I don't know what's got into me, but I'm in a learning phase. Yes, I know that's a good thing, but to tell you the truth, I haven't been able to create cards because I'm always searching for new techniques, and learning a few new computer programs!
Decoration : Unique (Aw come on,, nobody has sewing room for their restaurant concept)
Angels don’t just appear in classic texts and spiritual teachings. In today’s world, they also appear on TV, in movies, and on the internet. Examples include the motion pictures “It’s a Wonderful Life” as well as “Michael, and also the Television shows “Highway to Heaven and “Touched by an Angel”. It is also becoming easier to receive angel readings and locate angel cards online.
As the party passes within, the day brightens, and the sky once black turns imperceptibly to cerulean blue. Looking back through the gates, the landscape has changed to rolling grass covered hills. There is no sign of the bleak world at the end of time. A man strides forward. He is part lion, covered in golden fur, and his mane is pulled back into cord wrapped braids. He wears an embroidered robe and though he is stooped with age, he walks with a stately grace.
For our guests, I almost wanted it to feel like they were attending a glamorous party 100 years ago. We decided on lots of candle light, ivory rose petals and soft fabrics. We decided on ivory avalanche roses, white hydrangea and white snapdragons for the flowers to keep it simple and soft. We didn’t really do a color theme because the different rooms in the estate had different décor and we wanted to embrace that and not clash. We kept the menus, place cards and table names simple on ivory stock with black simple cursive.
Level 10: MP Cost: 12, Duration: 120 seconds, ATT: +20.
Explosive fireworks over, Francesca rebuffs his invitation to dinner. While the sparks may fly between them physically, she doesn’t believe they could spend more than a few minutes in the same room without arguing. Her suspicions prove correct when Francesca reports for her new position the next morning—and discovers she’s been hired as Reed’s new marketing partner.
What do you do when your "look" is perceived to be a hindrance and closes of access..There are Black and White cases (no pun intended) as in the case of Trayvon Martin ... but what if you could not get served, or were refused entry into a club based on your "look". What if t were your skin color; Your sexuality.
Another one of my wifely duties is to explain to Dork how the blender works. Not like, how to push the button to make it blend up stuff. He totally already has that mastered since he drinks like three protein shakes a day. I'm talking about how to put the thing back together once I've taken it apart and scrubbed it clean since, as we've already discussed, that's something a good wife does.
Without further ado... here are a few highlights!
JJ: Oh my God…
Anna and I have been married for 4 years now. In every country, our marriage is legal and valid. We even have a son together who is almost 3 years old.
So this week I'm the guest host over at The Butterfly Effect and it's all about creating layers in your artwork. And I explained in my post that when I was making my original piece, I was using a smaller canvas (8 x 8) for my paint palette because I'm tired of wasting paint and wanted to do something with the the paint that I always have left over. So every time I was finished painting, I would take the unused paint on my "palette" and just play around with it.
The movie is now available in seven languages and has a lovely, haunting score by John Campbell. Ten years after the first release of my novel, it was out of print, when another publisher, Steeple Hill, purchased the rights to reissue it, and asked me to write a sequel as well.
Over the upcoming weeks I’m going to be sharing some things that have been working for us while we explore camping with a baby. This means meal planning, packing for a baby under one, picking a campsite and creating a safe space for baby, outdoor crafts and activities for preschool aged kids, and other ideas. If there’s anything you’d be interested in seeing, I’m all ears!
Hugh's own garden is based around 2 ponds which make this hot, sandy garden seem cool and fresh even when its 37 like today.
I just cleaned 4 years of grime off of our high chair because Jayce is now in a booster seat at the table.
Personally, I'd rather lay out his clothes. I like putting outfits together, and he does have nice clothes. He just can't figure out what goes with what.
Kronenbourg's advertising strategy has, over the years, always seemed a little lost to me - like the brand doesn't really know what it wants to be. It's arty - or maybe not. It's French - OK, but does anyone care? It's got small bubbles in it - oh, puh-leease.
All-inclusive restaurants and swim-up bars. Count me in.
The main highlight is Donald Sutherland’s character, Oddball. He is an anachronism==a hippe twenty some odd years too early. Often, something like that would bug me, but I enjoy the character. He is a concession to the audience of the time which is entertaining enough to forgive his being a generation out of place. Something tells me if he had a kid after the war ended, he would grow up to be Tommy Chong. But maybe I am generating negative waves and should say something righteous and positive for a change.
survivors will become defendants.
This was one topic that had me brimming with ideas. I finally just closed my and let the words do what they wanted.
10 times the street rate.
Pfiuh, and that was my highlight of 2011. If you got bored reading this I don't blame you, it's such a very long post, even I got up late to make this post until 3:00 AM. But I know I'm gonna read this post again in 2013 and looked back to see how much our life has changed us.
Today I put it over Essie Muchi, Muchi. ILLY tends to be a bit thick and goopy so I have thinned it already and I can see needing to thin it regularly. It's actually a little difficult to get a very thin application. More thinner required.
I printed out each comment. I read each one over and over. On Tuesday, I sat in Debbie's office and read them out loud. And we marveled at your kindness and generosity and bravery. Your gentle outpourings of truth and love. So thank you my friends. Thank you for sharing a part of you with me and all who come here. Your willingness to open your hearts and my willingness to open my heart feels so right. I feel so proud of all of us.
At least some of the vegetarian criticism of Pollan, then, can’t be explained away by objections to his condoning meat eating in some form. The difference in the way that the two books were received might be explained in part by the fact that Foer makes an argument for vegetarianism, but I think it should not be overlooked that The Omnivore’s Dilemma presents an argument against vegetarianism. I’ll look at that argument much more closely later, but for now I’ll just say that Pollan doesn’t seem to take the discussion very seriously, even if he devotes a long chapter of his book to it. Early in the discussion he suggests that the spread of vegetarianism might be a product of “the breeze of fashion” (306); he later expresses pity for the “tofu eater” because “Dreams of innocence are just that; they usually depend on a denial of reality that can be its own form of hubris” (362). His dismissiveness persists to the present day, most recently exemplified by his review of Eating Animals that showed precious little evidence of his having read Foer’s book.
1 progenitive
The challenge is to use at least 2 Magnolia stamps on your creation.
The summer is off to a rockin' start!! We have been to Charleston for the beach and aquarium, Kevin took a trip out to California for work (3 weeks long!!), I was in a wedding in OREGON!, and we went to Atlanta for a week to visit with Kevin's family for the 4th. Kevin and Ruth both celebrated birthdays last week, and our anniversary is this Thursday.
Reid-"But..but..he.."
‘Abraj’ (horoscope) is another of their less ‘serious’ tracks. SC MoCha explained to NOW Extra that this track takes recordings from weekly programme on a Bethlehem-based radio station, Bethlehem Radio 2000, dedicated to horoscope forecasts. He explained, “people call in and give their date of birth and they get told, ‘oh, you’re going to get married this summer or stuff like that.’” For SC MoCha not every track has to be about military checkpoints and occupation. It is with tracks such as ‘Abraj’ that you bring people closer together:
Extraordinary – drink a large whisky
“Muslim is an adjective of Islam. Hence there can be no Muslim without Islam. The bottom line is a Muslim can NEVER be a SECULAR.’ … (secularism) ‘represents a great challenge to the national identity of Muslims…”
‘Therefore do not let sin reign in your mortal body, that you should obey it in its lusts. And do not present your members as instruments of unrighteousness to sin, but present yourselves to God as being alive from the dead, and your members as instruments of righteousness to God. For sin shall not have dominion over you, for you are not under law but under grace.’
The driveway is gravel with a line of grass (mostly weeds) down the middle. We never drive down the middle so they should be ok.
These days there are of course many orphans in real life, because horrible things still happen. BUT it's really not as prevalent as fiction would have you believe.
“To my knowledge,” Ringelberg said, “this is the first time in a case with only cruelty charges that we’ve gotten an active sentence.”
I shall certainly be watching this appearance. Let us hope that Sir Roderic Lyne opens the batting on this one. Baroness Prashar of Runnymede, despite her appointment as Chairman of the Judicial Appointments Commission, is not one of the sharpest of questioners on current performance, at any rate.
My mom would call it a Chamber of Commerce day.
OK…what is Zen Studios Pinball?
“So we had,” he said, looking round at the forest and the hill. “So we had.”
MOVIE QUOTE: Brennan Huff: This house is a fucking prison!
The camera sits square on the back of the phone and sports a nice little blue trim to add a little style to a rather grey device. If you like a pop of color, you’ll surely appreciate the detail. Along the left edge you’ll find an MHL-style micro-USB port, which also doubles as HDMI out, and on the right edge you’ll find the volume rocker. A 3.5mm headphone jack and the lock button share space on the top edge of the phone.
I am out of time now. I have to get on the bike as I have to build the miles for the 50-mile ride in June.
7) I'm currently buried under revision books
I know. Another recipe from Baking From My Home to Yours. But this one features strawberries (available now fresh anywhere in the northern hemisphere). I made it in February, when the first organic local strawberries showed up at Trader Joe's. They were beauties, sweet and floral, juicy, and the first harbinger of a spring that was way too early this year, at least in our area.
Don’t worry… If I could travel back in time, I’d smack my uneducated self…
I ordered from the companies artfire page on the 27th of November and paid via echeque which cleared on the 2nd of December. It was during their black friday sale so I made a rather large order coming to about £40 ($60) Since then I've heard nothing. I know that earlier in the year they'd had a big problem keeping up with orders because of a Heartsy deal but that seemed to have calmed down. I expected to have a bit of a wait with the turn around time and then international shipping so, even though I got other Black friday orders in a couple of weeks, I didn't think much about it. But then New years came and went and there was no sign of my order. No shipping confirmation, no apology for delay, nothing. So I sent Veronica an email, just enquiring politely when my order was. No reply. I asked around on some facebook groups and was told by several people that while Hi Fi orders often take a while to arrive they always DO arrive. I also heard that Veronica was pregnant so i thought maybe that was why she hadn't replied to my email and thought I'd give her the benefit of the doubt and wait a while longer.
That Hope may rise and declare all wounds exhumed.
a two minute acoustic instrumental of immortality, not on the official set list
Christopher Plummer, The Last Station
With DT members from all over Europe.
Something else was happening in parallel as well at that time. The Commodore 64 had given way to the savvier Commodore Amiga. PC had finally grown up and fallen into the “mouse” trap of better computing and was no longer limited to key tapping. Floppies and tapes had given way to hard-drives and optical media that came with tons of audio visual content. People had started talking to each other through bulky boxes without wires. The monolog of analog world had started crackling with the buzz of the digital. Email had gained recognition as being “as valid a communication means as a written and posted letter.” The WEB with no Spiderman behind it was fast growing as the superhero of the future.
Cong. Niel Tupas: “How Will I Know”
2. My mother taught me RELIGION.
9:21pm: Well, crap. The morphine finally wore off.
“Excuse me, who is there?” Obadiah said into the night.
I got Lyme Disease when I was only 2, and after many years of extreme joint pain and a millions different medications - one finally worked to send it into remission.
Just wanted to say how you inspired me you help me to find my voice artistically. In case I never get to meet you, I hope this letter encourages you to continue to speak truth and at least tempt you to make those sequels
It’s a album that is very easy on the ear, it reminds me of Deacon Blue, in a nice way. It leans towards the more jangle upbeat end of C86. The songs have catch hooks. Unlike much of the material associated with the C86 movement, the subject of their songs is not just unrequited love.
Don’t skip this step. Some small presses that fail under one name start up again almost immediately under another; and staff who leave under questionable circumstances may start their own publishing enterprises....It’s a very, very good idea to do some digging into a small press’s business background so you can be reasonably sure it doesn’t have a seamy past.The re-launch of LSP Digital is a prime example of why this is so important.
Scotland immediately brings to mind my father’s deep love for bagpipers. When I was growing up, between the nasally Johnny Horton and the Tchaikovsky, there would be this annoying bleat that would fill the house. This was when I would counteract the horror by listening to Guns N’ Roses. But Scotland’s grand history og pop music should never be dismissed. As such, under the cut, the first five songs I love from Scottish artists will begin.
I have a before and after picture... but I swear my hair looks so much worse in this before picture than if ever did when I went out in public. We'll blame it on having it brushed out right before the photo.
I think I will just tell SGNB that I am done playing. Recently, I have been playing on Tuesdays and some Thursdays at a par three course near our home. I rather enjoy being paired up with whoever shows up.
Within the church we sang Christian hymns.
3. In college, I was radio & tv broadcast major. For a media writing class we had to start writing the script for a TV show. I picked Seinfeld. Jerry was dating a woman who was blind but for some reason kept suggesting going to museums or movies for their dates and he was trying to figure out if she really was blind. George got into a kerfuffle getting on a bus to go to a job interview and had a fight with an old woman because he wouldn't give up his seat ... let's just say the old lady shows up later and George freaks out at his job interview.
With the affright that from her aspect came,
So, what if I pour energy into things that are a big fat fail?
For the time being, at least.
Sure you can do whatever you want, but you don’t deserve compassion because you either asked for it or should’ve known better.
“Terrorist acts like this violate the State of the law which is inherent with our society. We demand federal and local authorities to carry out a prompt and thorough investigation, as well as a judicial process against the responsible for the terrorist act”, stressed the text.
The group is currently touring in support of their latest album, “The Circle“.
The other day when I was driving home in my old Toyota, I glanced at the display in the panel in front of me. It showed 18:18 18. The first two digits signified time, the last the outside temperature in Celsius. I had to smile and recalled a similar event taking place a few months back, when we drove to Prague to visit my family this past July, when the same sequence was 22.
April pansies and hyacinth;
Recently was out a new book entitled "Google & the Law" and subtitled "Empirical Approaches to Legal Aspects of Knowledge-Economy Business Models", is published by Springer and is a product of the T. M. C. Asser Press. This book is a global collaboration text (as collective work), edited by our team member Aurelio López-Tarruella Martínez, and contain thirteen papers written by authors from several countries and legal cultures. One of them is our well-known blog founder Jeremy Phillips, who wrote a very interesting article called "Google AdWords: Trade Mark Law and Liability of Internet Service Providers".
So you know what? Hell with it. Toka had a suggestion in the comments the other day that I should just form my own guild, and you know what, I think there’s already enough of a track record for me to say I’d be a better leader than most of these EO GM’s (I’m looking right at you, Manageurdeath). So yeah, here’s your chance to get in on the ground floor – I’m starting a guild! So if you’re on Goldwater-Kalimdor server or you think you could use a change of scenery, hit me up. I know Spazzle and Mokvar are going to be helping found it with me, and I know Garona plays so maybe she’d be interested in rolling an alt here at least.
God, in His glorious grace, did not stop there. He granted us the gift of His Holy Spirit, so that the “burdens”, being the responsibilities that we are meant to manage, may be made bearable as we are equipped and empowered by Him.
Dear Fellow Pilgrims in Christ Jesus,
Today's You Search, I Answer came in the form of an email from Missey. She states:
The plan was to keep Emily company, but she had a nagging hamstring issue, so we agree to play the day by ear. I ran with my camera, which led to me snapping a lot of frunner pics on course...
Fantastic and the Royal should start marketing this and using this as an advertising campaign right now while the iron is hot as this as an advertising campaign has the ability to catapult the Royal Mail into the black and even make them a company worth buying shares in before they go through the roof.
I would love to hear what you think about my take on the sketch!
Publishing people don’t ask for it. For them the world is enough. Admittedly they often ask for strange and ambitious parts of it – see my earlier post concerning my publisher’s wish to secure rights to sell my work in the McDonald and Heard Islands, Antarctic volcanoes inhabited by nothing more bookish than seals – but in the end they keep it terrestrial.
In short, if you choose to use copywork during your school routine, you will find that your child will become better at spelling, writing, grammar, penmanship, as well as, retention. Copywork is so simple to implement, there really is no reason not to give it a try.
Next, from the bottom of the skirt measure up 6-1/2" and make a mark
Selangor Mentri Besar Tan Sri Khalid Ibrahim in his speech questioned the commission’s inaction on allegations of corruption against Barisan Nasional as former state government, headed by Datuk Seri Mohd Khir Toyo.
300 grams/ 10.5 oz flour
Wikipedia defines fusion cuisine as:
“Maybe a three.” If the pain persists longer then just a moment or two, she’ll probably give it a higher rating. And besides, the scale, like pain, is highly subjective.
It is also a UNESCO World Heritage Sites giving a boost to tourism in India significantly. It is the largest brick and stone minarets in the world. It is not only attractions of Delhi tourism but is also one of the most important places to visit India. These attractions of Delhi have a pride position in a well designed itinerary of India.
4. God And The Devil (Christiansen, v. d. Knaap, Buschman) 2.45
(My email responses may be delayed due to timezone differences.)
*Forgive me Mrs. 4444s because it has been awhile since my last frag....
I can’t imagine what it would be like to be a senior government bureaucrat or corporate executive planning the best way to ram a pipeline across thousands of kilometres of pristine wilderness, much of it traditional First Nations hunting and fishing territory. I can’t imagine waking up one morning and saying to myself, I’m going to use my hedge fund to buy up thousands of acres of prime agricultural land in Ontario and turn one-third of it into an open-pit quarry because after all, in this day and age, gravel and profit are far more important than clean water and food.
Joan won the panel of kite flying children. I hope it brings you many hours of free motion fun! Remember, stock up on needles and clean out the lint before you start!
Mr Francis said: 'He wasn't screaming, he was as relaxed as can be.
They were very lucky that day and except for the earthquakes, they were all safe.
“What do you mean these ARE my cinnamon rolls.”
So... running into her wasn't quite like running into an old friend. We didn't exactly leave HS on speaking terms. Ya know?
baggy jeans that had seen better days,
Tomorrow I've got page 7 for you! And don't forget to check out all the pages in my Christmas journal by clicking on the link to the right.
But writing Scotch was a different issue. Every second sentence would be Jillian finishing a glass of Scotch. I had to start making charts to see how drunk she would be. I had to change “I drank the glass of Scotch” to “I tipped the Scotch back,” and other horrors.
He sits there and denies me
Barnes and Noble, who has a tablet for electronic books, The Nook, also has an app that can be used on the iPad. I figured it would be a cinch to purchase books with the grant money that PTO granted me for books. I suddenly found myself ahead of the wave…
You never think it will be you - but eventually it is.
1tsp Rice flour
Perhaps more important, powerful sources regularly take advantage of media routines and dependency to “manage” the media, to manipulate them into following a special agenda and framework (as we will show in detail in the chapters that follow). Part of this management process consists of inundating the media with stories, which serve sometimes to foist a particular line and frame on the media (e.g., Nicaragua as illicitly supplying arms to the Salvadoran rebels), and at other times to help chase unwanted stories off the front page or out of the media altogether (the alleged delivery of MIGs to Nicaragua during the week of the I984 Nicaraguan election). This strategy can be traced back at least as far as the Committee on Public Information, established to coordinate propaganda during World War I, which “discovered in I9I7-I8 that one of the best means of controlling news was flooding news channels with ‘facts,’ or what amounted to official information.”
So the products are a bonus…
I had 1.3 yards of ivory fleece (which was more than enough for a size 4 jacket with mittens & ear warmer), 1 ball of cream doodle yarn, & 4 ivory buttons.
I stopped to do the switch over and for the first time ever I thought that I might be sick. I’d been coughing a lot during the run, probably because of the wind not really allowing me to get a proper breath, and I was feeling pretty rough. I tried to put the thought out of my mind and sipped my water. My iPod fired up to The Pretenders and ‘Chain Gang’ and I was off on the home stretch.
Okay, to make the little post rig, I welded it together. Possibly you can make the same shape of thing with some other materials, but I wanted a lot of strength. To do it the way I did, you will need some 1/2 square tube steel, 2 half- inch diameter, 4 5/8 inch long steel bolts, a welder, some sort of saw that can cut metal, various clamps, an angle grinder and all the safety equipment that goes with it. Or you can ask someone who knows how to weld to make it for you. I certainly don’t advise using all of this stuff unless you know what you are doing or have someone who does to help instruct you. Possibly you can devise another, less difficult way to make the same sort of rig out of other materials, but this is how I did it.
Dead or alive You spin me around (like a record) UK
I'm so bored of saying hello everytime, I think I'll say: Hoooooooooyaaaa wonderful people. Anyhow, you know how I've not done an outfit post in a really long time and I felt like I had to get out of my lazy mood and shoot one. However I've been really sick for the past two days Fever, headache and all that crap. On the bright side I've been writing a lot and I'm really glad its been appreciated.
Freemasonry earned the enmity of both religious institutions and
“And Babylon, the glory of kingdoms, the beauty of the Chaldees' excellency, shall be as when God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah.” – (Isaiah 13:9)
I decided that a card was just to much to think about at the moment so I decided to make this fab little gift for a tea lover the tutorial was made by Sandie over at Whiff of Joy here is the link if your interested http://whiffofjoy.blogspot.com/search/label/Tea%20Bag%20Holder
-For this challenge I want you to create a project using Just Elements! Do not use any of the die cutting machines!
By creating less waste I am helping the environment and making a social impact. I am impacting the environment by reducing the amount of air pollution and water pollution. Socially, I am helping to preserve the land, reduce climate change and air pollution so people can live healthy lives, and groundwater contamination, which keeps our water sources safe. Globally, I am reducing the garbage that is sent overseas to third world countries or released into the ocean where it pollutes the waters and endangers wildlife.
I recently order a half-pound of dried chamomile flowers from Bulk Herb Store (along with many other wonderful herbs). I already have big plans for those sweet little buds. I am eager to begin discovering other ways of bringing health to my family and myself with chamomile.
All groups need rules..and I have laid out the rules of the group below. Please do not be offened with any rule. With so many members, rules are an important part of running a great group.
It’s strange, why are some people wealthy and others are not? Social Darwinism or just plain luck? It does jade thousands and millions of aspiring writers a day.
The thing is strictly up to you;
Craig Mummey and I continue to collaborate as director and actor to bring the character of Michael to full, 3D reality. And, like building an armature for a piece of sculpture, here are the underlying thoughts that allow me to put flesh on the skeleton:
As you read this story, it’s not all it is. This story belongs to a bigger conversation but the rest will have to come in layers on other days. It’s just a single bite of pepperoni taken off a large supreme pizza. There’s so much more and this is not a good representation of the whole. But I have to start somewhere… so here it is: A taste. A layer. A glimpse. A foothill.
What are you looking for today?
Terrified of discovery, Charise tries to hold her persistent suitor at bay, though her heart has already surrendered. Will she lose him if he learns the truth, or is love enough to bind the cancan dancer and the duke?
Please visit Lily Pad Cards to get the challenge details and to see the Design Team inspiration, as usual the creativity is off the charts!
In my lasts post (click HERE if you missed it) I explained why Fall Creek Falls State Park is such a special place for Betsy and me. Saturday we visited the park again, and did many of the things we did eleven years ago. The weather Saturday wasn’t nearly as nice as it was back then, but we’re still glad we went.
from the planet Zeetron,
LG Optimus 2X will initially ship with AndroidAndroid 2.2, later next year will be updated to gingerbread 2.3.
Cure Just like heaven UK
Haiku by Mirsad Denjo (Bosnia). Artwork by myself.
Swastikas aren't allowed in Germany, even when used as part of a faith and civilization older than Germany - even though the emblem itself was appropriated by a faction of Germany. Also not allowed? Nazi propaganda films. I would have to look a little closer to find out if there's a museum exception or the like, but my general interactions showed no such thing.
Don't get me wrong, I really do enjoy my job and I am so lucky to have it! When I finally accepted that I needed to start working full time I had no idea what I was going to do. I never imagined that I would spend all day talking with librarians, teachers, and parents about children's literature.
While on Earth you are all experiencing consciousness in each and every type and form that it has to offer, and the majority of what have been seen as lower dimensional forms existing in the form of plants and trees and such, are themselves ascending and this ascension of the elementals is happening as the ascension of Mother Gaia’s core which has already taken place, begins to echo unto your surface and unto each and every being on your surface who is aware of ascension and who is working in themselves to grow toward ascension and to evolve into the states of consciousness in which you all once existed so very happily.
One adviser whispered into his ears. King Ajit smiled. “Okay then, we shall do what you have suggested.”
Then it was a bit more of a chore to get my daughter to bed (“Can I play Wii Baseball one more time? Please?”) and we switched to something of about an hour in length on the Tivo, like an episode of “Law & Order.”
Okay, my Husby made it up.
The ultimate goal of transgender counseling is to help the transgendered individual accept their uniqueness, rather than hiding it away in shame or confusion. While it is easy for transgendered people to become isolated, often due to denial and withdrawal, counselors can help you fully integrate in all areas of society, including the home, workplace and places of worship. Although there are counselors who will manipulate or in some way abuse the transgendered client, knowing what to look for and what to avoid will help you find the best counselor for you.
this last week & it was back to the dr. again)
The year ahead still looks positive, but the global climate continues to cloud the horizon. Yet, ours is a resilient workforce, one that has helped to build our country to what it is today.
However the Local Government and NHS Service Group Executives in UNISON have been persuaded to allow negotiations to go ahead around the principles agreed with the government. The leadership has argued that the ballots for strike action are still live and action can be restarted. UNISON branches need to make it clear that the union leadership that the must not budge on the core issues of the dispute and be prepared to resurrect action to defend pensions.
In morning anthem to the spring.
2) It’s location (if it’s not already on the list)
You can use these questions as conversation starters at mealtimes, while completing daily activities together, or at a family gathering. Work up to the deeper questions like “How would you like to be remembered?” and follow up with related questions to keep the conversation going. If your family member with dementia gets confused, frustrated or upset by your questions, change the subject. You can always rephrase the question and try asking it again at another time.
The dissolution of the Scorpions is the logical outcome of the ANC's model of closed, patronage politics in which the interests of the party trump the rights of citizens and the higher law of the party means independent institutions must be undermined or taken over if they thwart the power abuse of the ANC's ruling clique.
I love the vibrant red.
Whatever Westminster decides to do, we (in Wales) need to have democratically control of our own resources, we could start with repatriating control of the crown estates transferring control of lands in (and off) to the Welsh Government in Cardiff. For the life of me I can see no realistic reason why this feudal anachronism cannot be consigned to the dustbin of history.
Dave Ramsey - Bass
Certain regional allies of the US are also playing a dual game when President Karzai is going to take the Afghans into confidence over their future. The phenomenon that can hamper the Karzai’s initiative is the rising tide of violence. Even when all the Afghans want to get rid of wars and violence a minority of them can only thrive on the same. And this minority group is being patronised, financed and provoked by external financiers.
A checklist, for those of you that are interested...
The Workout-
My tech was pleasant enough, although she did say, "And we're monitoring for..." (flips through file) "uh, do you know why you're being monitored?"
Why did it stick for us a fairly progressive spiritual family in a traditionally evangelical conservative setting?
It was not long before this reprogramming began to filter down into the lower grades of high school and earlier. Soon it spilled over from the campus and class room into the work force, as businesses, under pressure from multicultural enforcers, strove to obey the demands of these now powerful social engineers, in order to avoid entanglements in “race” troubles. And so a new industry was born – one made up of phony “race experts,” “race consultants,” and “diversity facilitators.” Companies learned that if they paid the right price now, they could fend off possible trouble later.
The second venue of attack via regulation is more numerous but has an immediate dovetail to the first outcome. The other method of determining the viability of a fetus comes from impregnation. This centers around the act known as sexual intercourse. These acts have dates and times when they happen, plus places and individuals involved. The second way to determine viability is to have individuals responsibly know who they have had sex with and when that happened. If a woman or host wants an abortion, the record keeping puts down hard lines of development of a fetus by a given point. Simple exams including ultrasound can determine if these dates jibe with the given development phase of the fetus. Multiple sex acts will give a range of time, yes, but the establishment of minimums and maximums for fetal development will help to determine viability questions much faster.
skin disease, and the fear that it will spread.
In sun, and as I stood, a slim
2 speculation
react_strangers: fine, excited and friendly, jumps, but gets off if told "off" and/or person turns away from her
My Luis Mendoza experiment didn’t last too long. In fact, it lasted all of 2 weeks. To be fair, even after a very shaky outing to open his season, in which he looked absolutely lost against a less than stellar hitting Oakland team, I decided that he deserved a mulligan. In that game against Oakland, his line read: 5 innings pitched, 1 ER, 4 BB, 5 Hts, and 2Ks. Now, you look at that line and think that it wasn’t all that bad. But in watching that game online through MLBtv (great yearly deal if your a fanatic), I quickly began to realize that he ran into deep counts and was just not attacking hitters with vigor — essentially, I was waiting for him to stop fiddling around with hitters and just attack them. He didn’t. He appeared tentative, and as evidenced by his walk total, he was just not prepared to give up any big hits, preferring to put guys on base. Location issues were not a problem in the spring, which began to worry. I had reservations after the first game, but of course, you don’t bail after a shaky outing with a pitcher you highly tout and who was backed up by spring numbers — at least that’s what I thought.
Pretty sure nothing says "season's greetings" like this jungle-meets-Donna-Reed-meets-closet-alcoholic look. Big time thank you to Michael Aghy for working through the brain aftermath of "New Years Apocalypse Manifests in the Three Minutes and Fifty Three Seconds that It Takes to Scream along to House of Jealous Lovers and It's Pretty Much a Blur from Then on Till About Five AM" extravaganza. Neither one of us were in the best shape after that, but our inner creepy prevailed, and voila: art.
What is the difference between site planning and town planning
4th of July weekend was kind of hellish for me. I spent my weekend helping a friend move to San Fransisco, and as repayment for my kindness my car decided to break down on me in Redding on the fourth. I got to spend two extra days in California while I waited for a shop to be open and my car to be fixed. Because of that I missed two days of my bike riding for my PSP. However while down in San Fransisco I did a few things to be sustainable. First thing is I made sure all of the cardboard moving boxes were recycled properly. Simple I know, but its the little things that add up. The second thing I did was help my friend do some painting, so I insisted she spend the extra cash on a low VOC (volatile organic compound) paint. Some basic benefits of Low VOC paint are low odor, reduced toxins, reduces landfill, ground water, and ozone depleting contaminates. A complete list of benefits can be found here.
To nature you return.
Raja Petra charged that Anwar’s performance as Selangor Economic Advisor has been unimpressive, and that he spent too much time going overseas for functions and lectures at universities.
Quickly now, for I am short on time:
The blockbuster has taken over £15m in it’s opening week. And as a comic book fan I cannot wait to see this film for myself.
Good Morning, everyone!!!
All I can say is thanks for having us on tap, guys. After those hundreds of espressos for the past decade, I'll be able to have a beer at Heine Brothers, and a local beer at that.
-goodbye pile!
about the old intricate detailed styles of the Victorian era found in each city and small town that inspires. Of course India for centuries has always had a great love of details so the European influences
All the inks and markers are MOMENTO.
‘Yeah.’
HOLY SHIT! He just THREW A BUS at that other idiot over there! A BUS! What do you think you’re going to get? This isn’t Superman, buddy – he isn’t going to give you a stern scolding and deliver you to the local jail. He’s going to render your body two-dimensional beneath some massive projectile.
If you would like to take part in the sketch challenge for the chance to win a prize from Bo Bunny then head on over the the Bo Bunny Blog to see what you need to do. :)
1) Coaching
Everywhere the followers of Christ went, there was either a revival or a riot. Those passionate believers could not be ignored — brushed aside as irrelevant. Their words and lifestyle was polarizing, calling forth a response.
Despite Wilder's involvement, The Hitmen's material remains unissued on CD, and there appear to be no plans in the pipeline to rectify this. This is an odd way to treat the material of a pivotal member of a globally successful act, but hopefully the below tracks will assuage people's curiosity.
This will be my last daily post. I am going to switch to weekly posts. The work with Remington is going to be a lot more repetitive and I'd hate to be posting the same thing everyday.
Yeah, Sherlock. It actually is.
She loved the Lord.
Next week looks set to be busy too. The other Gwen, from Selçuk will come over at the beginning of the week for a couple of days. I also plan to visit Gwen in Suleyman in Bitez, and Karen from the Turkish Animal Group will hopefully be collecting me from Milas towards the end of the week, to take me to the dog shelter for the day.
Everyone got them right! Which means today will need to be much harder...
I called my sister. The conversation went like this.
AS: Your series Thresholds was included in the seminal book New Color/New Work, by Sally Eauclaire, published in 1984, which places you among the masters of early color photography, including Stephen Shore, Joel Sternfeld, Mitch Epstein and William Eggleston. As one of the few photographers celebrated for color photography during this time did you have the sense that your work was challenging the conventions of art photography? Was there camaraderie among your contemporaries that spoke of this movement and pushed the work towards greater acceptance?
• Winners of the 2012 Independent Publisher Book Awards (IPPYs) were announced yesterday. Among the 74 categories were two of particular interest to crime- and thriller-fiction followers. Omnimystery News has the wrap-up.
Because we were fitting our judging into NCAA basketball-style brackets, we narrowed down the field by picking four IPAs from east of the Mississippi and four IPAs from west of the Mississippi. From that elite eight we chose a final four, and ultimately a winner. Surprisingly, without any manipulation, our top IPAs included two from the East bracket and two from the West. After another round of tasting and a bit of arguing, we ranked those from one to four to produce a winner.
In his love and mercy he redeemed them;
Disclosure: “George Gutowski” writes from a “Caveat Emptor Perspective” I hold no positions in stocks mentioned in this post. I have no plans to initiate new positions within the next 72 hours.
The bride’s friend of 10 years and official wedding photographer, Candace Weaver, said Carina made a good choice marrying Kodie.
And you are the only player
I love negative die cutting and when I saw that the muse for CASE Study, Jen Rzasa, had this gorgeous card as inspiration, I had to play along using a heart punch instead. I went for a similar shape and ribbon detail.
First of all, I've found a new photographer who can take my picture. I tend to shy away when it comes to taking self-portrait. I can't take my own pictures unless it's 100% necessary because iI feel like I'm being self-important. I can smile at the camera as long as there's someone on the other side, telling me to smile....
Is there anything you'd like me to advertise? You know, just so I don't go out of my cuntbarging fucking mind?
Adjectives in Brodhead statements, meanwhile, don’t seem consistent with considering it “equally unjust to prejudge their guilt in the absence of proof and certainty.” At various points, he labeled the lacrosse players “arrogant,” “dishonorable,” “disrespectful,” and “irresponsible”. He said their behavior was “heinous,” “highly inappropriate,” and “unacceptable,” and blasted the team’s “culture of privilege.” And when given an opportunity in his June 5 statement to balance these characterizations with the Coleman Committee’s revelation of the many positive things about the players’ academic, athletic, social, and community service performance, Brodhead pointedly declined to do so. His characterization of the players’ character remained exclusively negative.
There’s no attitude switch for the Generation Y-ers when they enter social media. The attitude of give me, credit me, and make me feel special persists everyday on social media. It doesn’t take long to see someone on Twitter complaining about what they should have gotten. Just show up late to a party advertising free food and free drink. You’ll hear the Generation Y-ers complaining about how they didn’t get any free food or free drink that they deserved. Some businesses have reported hearing the “I’m a Yelper so you should give me free food/drink.” Sadly, that’s not unheard of from unscrupulous bloggers as well.
It's officially been 24 hrs smoke free.
Ananias was called in verse 10, “a disciple” meaning that he was a follower of Jesus, the Messiah. Thus, he knew who it was speaking to him for he said, “Behold, I am here, Lord.”
As for a god like that. No. There are no other gods that are so bipolar as the god of the bible. Bloodthirsty maniac one minute, loving father figure the next that is still going to condemn countless innocents because they don’t believe in him.
I’m not a perfectionist – there are plenty of times where “good enough” is really good enough. But this was one of those things where a bit of a mistake was going to snowball into something pretty wonky. So I started ripping out seams. If you don’t sew, this means that I took this little sharp-edged picky thing and stuck it under every 5th stitch or so, and pulled – cutting the stitch. You work your way all the way down the seam, picking and picking. Then you pull the pieces apart. I pulled apart a good half of a quilt top. I measured. I ironed. And I laid the quilt top out on the floor, ready to be sewn back together.
The world’s voracious demand for British character actors threatens to strip the globe of its entire supply by 2050.
No one knows how such an event is even possible. There is no record of any attack like this ever having been done before within the insider world.
The boys and I have been reading a lot of Christian biographies this year. I’m loving learning about the manner in which Christians follow their Savior. It’s incredible to see the impact their lives make on the world when they just surrender to their Lord. We’ve read about Christians from the Resurrection of Jesus forward. These were men and women who lived in different places, at different times in history.
Matt Simons and Chris Ayer (730-8)
I had no idea what Piccadilly Circus looked like so when I stepped out from the underground (if you plan on using the underground a bit, get yourself an Oyster Card makes travel much easier and cheaper) I was caught by surprise, and my love for the city grew. It was like New York's Times Square except with red double deckers driving around.
Is everyone else as bewildered by the new Jacob's Mallows ad as I am? It kicks off with the fuzzy and familiar "Kimberly, Mikado and Coconut Creams" jingle, but before it ever gets a chance to lull the unsuspecting viewer into a false sense of security, we're assaulted with some sort of R&B auto tune disaster and a watered down Pussycat Doll rejects crashing the Mad Hatter's Tea-Party acid trip. Watch it below, if you dare.
Being chained also is painful for the dog.
Is sicklied o'er with the pale cast of thought,
Most importantly, ask God to guide you as you evaluate your spiritual health and set goals for growth. He will bring the spiritual transformation as you strive to live a live that pleases Him.
When you're ready to make the gelato, give the mixture a good stir and pour into the bowl of the ice-cream maker. Process until the mixture is the consistency of soft-serve frozen yogurt, then remove the bowl from the maker and return it to the freezer. It will harden a bit more, but not much.
She continued, "Whether the developer pays mortgage recording taxes also has nothing to do with condemnation. With ESDC projects, such as Atlantic Yards, whether the developer benefits from a mortgage recording tax exemption is an issue negotiated by the developer with ESDC and NYC."
To have so soon scap'd worlds and fleshes rage,
So I'd best get on with editing the June edition then hadn't I?
5. You've Been A Good Old Wagon
MALLORY: I’m never gonna see Chelsea, or Betsy, or Mattie, again…or Smith…
No domestic abuse laws.
I am looking forward to read your comments!
Chain mail ($70) - chain hauberks are not uncommon amongst the bandits and monster-hunters.
#5 1981 Jim Jordan EP Eastwood Discus 195'8
I have now had this thing for a week. It looks like this:
The "teacher" presented Isabel with the choice of two prizes: a girlie pair of boot spurs or a cool rifle that made sounds when the trigger was pulled. She chose the rifle.
The sign on my body could have been an emblem or a stain, the keys to the kingdom or the mark of Cain. I never knew. I never knew as I washed, and the blood streaked, faded, and finally disappeared, whether I’d purified myself or ruined the blood sign of the Passover.
Back to the shoot, its just the fridge top, no need for fancy marble or stone slabs! The refection at first bothered me but in hindsight its added to this simple grouping.
All Mommy could see were merely hollow boxy indentations or cave-ins, whatever you call it and Bertie is nowhere to be seen! Darn! Even the leaflet of specifications indicated that there is supposed to be a Bertie Bus included!
What I didn’t realise was that my presence in an organisation might, quite naturally, bring on aversion and fear.
What's next? My Macaron I've been trying to finish since January!
Are there other services offered at the veterinary office? As an example does it provide boarding when you have to be gone for an extended period of time. Leaving a pet with a veterinary office vs a conventional boarding venue may prove beneficial if the pet gets sick while you’re gone. If you have already established a relationship with the veterinarian and he/she would be familiar with your pet, this could become an additional help. The vet will be better aware of the pet’s overall condition and the way to take care of the condition.
96. Fiela se kind - Dalene Matthee
3 fixed
I have been working with the injury, steadily going to physio and watching other patients demanding and worn down by their afflictions. The chronic weight of chronic pain. I told myself it was more than I had, more than I needed, and relayed the information the specialist needed in a calm and unassuming manner of someone who was fine. Today they realized what I was trying to say, so unsuccessfully, through touch, and the severity of the situation I am in. Because the kind and unassuming mask I was wearing muted out the information they needed to fully understand.
I haven't had a weekend...much less a beer weekend in months. So I took advantage of a weekend off to attend the Draught House 41st Anniversary Party.
Art displays and demonstrations of green crafts and technology
Under Armour compression shirt and pants, covered by Under Armour loose gear shirt and shorts and my military camelback. On my feet I will be wearing Vibram Five Fingers to hopefully eliminate blisters, running though all that water.
You’re wearing the thick terry robe
Carlos Gracia, President of the Spanish Motorsport Federation: “It’s the second time I visit the headquarters. I made a brief first visit and the second time round I’ve liked them even more and I’m sure that the third time round it will be even better because this team is doing a fantastic job and are taking giant strides. I think that the facilities are wonderful and that they send an image out of what HRT Formula 1 Team is going to be in the short, medium and long term. It’s important to have the headquarters in Spain and for the team to become more Spanish and hand out opportunities to young mechanics, drivers and engineers from this country. We’re aware that in a Formula 1 team you need to have the best people from the best countries but to have a Spanish base is important looking ahead to the future”.
After drumming in Spit & Snot, Björk played flute for the prog-rocky Exodus, then sang in another happy-punk outfit, Tappi Tikarrass (which translates as "smooth as a cork in a bitch's arsehole"). But Björk's most formative band, pre-Sugarcubes, was Kukl, an Icelandic post-punk supergroup that included future Cubes Einar Orn and Siggi Baldursson. "I'm a bit mushy about that band," she says, twinkling ever so slightly. "It was my most important school. People have described Kukl as 'prog-punk' and it was more complex than most punk: we wouldn't write anything in 4/4 or use major keys, 'cos we considered that 'cheap'. But Kukl was pretty noisy and dark, really grim chords."
Barely in office a day, he was all for closing down Guantanamo until he learned there was no place for the detainees. The states did not want them in their prisons and foreign nations did not want them for any reason. When his Attorney General wanted to try the mastermind of 9/11 in New York City the outcry was deafening.
5 — Separatism is not an Option
Second, though writers can be introverted when it comes to "other" people, we are usually quite friendly with each other. We bounce ideas off of one another, critique another writer's work, and listen for their feedback on our own. So, even though we are commonly "loners," we are loners together. It's kind of like that Billy Joel line from Piano Man: "They're sharing a drink they call lonliness/But it's better than drinking alone."
Because she can.
Then I said, “Guess I lucked out!”
About Stan’s heart. Stan evidently was born with no outer shell at all; he is like the baby he describes “with its heart on the outside of its skin, clinging to its chest like a silver bell on a kitten’s bib, beating and bleeding and raw for all to see.” For a variety of reasons we learn as we follow Stan’s adventures, he is starved for affection, human touch, reciprocated love, and sex. At the first sign that a relationship is possible, Stan tears open his chest, reveals his own beating, ragged heart, and says, “Here. Take it. It’s yours.”
-You weighed 19 pounds, 10 ounces and were 26 1/2 inches long at your appointment.
I’ve been an AANR (American Association for Nude Recreation) member for several years, and in 2010, I had the honor of being chosen by the organization’s leaders to assist with the redesign of AANR.com. The website project was a great opportunity to help AANR strategize, visualize and realize a more empowered use of technology to expand connections with current members and clubs while also reaching out to the nude-curious. I also produced an explanatory video to introduce the new site to AANR’s extended leadership. Because I was able to work with AANR in these ways, I became more attuned to AANR’s vision and its challenges. I recognize the issues of those in the business of nudism, and I strongly identify with nudists who own and operate businesses in mainstream markets.
Hush, Hush by Becca Fitzpatrick
The discrepancy over his spousal and child support payments are not his only financial woes, however.
Oh on another note, Be sure to come and try our Buttermilk squares which are out of this world amazing! Also a family recipe and just plain sinful. They are dangerous to have extra's around here because I eat them all hahaha.
Our world is in constant turmoil today. Everyone seems to be defending a cause or fighting a battle of some sort. Whether it’s the war on terrorism, defending the cause of morality, sexual equality, the right to life, or the right to choose, our fight is always indicative of our passion and tells the story of what we hold dear.
i must admit, while this vegan MoFo's been a little stressful with work & going back to school, i'm a little sadfaced it's coming to an end. everyone kicked so much MoFo booty this year - invading the world with so much vegan awesomeness! MEGAyay!
Although you may not always come across a situation like I had where it would be easy to see the connection, you can be prepared in case an opportunity comes along. Make sure you keep a list of reputable professional contacts (handyman, plumber, electrician, real estate agent, etc – preferably those that are already your clients) so that when a client mentions a certain need, you can open your file and recommend a great person to help them out. And, on the flip side, request to be recommended from these people as well if and when they come across someone in need of insurance.
Cuisine: Digestif
Something incredible happens however. After Isha is killed, Oscar is in dire straits. Unable to forage for himself, lacking the experience and the know-how to feed himself, he slowly begins to starve to death. However, the alpha male of his tribe, Freddy, decides to adopt the baby and raise him as his own. Some naturalists have theorized that this occurs in the wild; however, this is the first time such an occurrence has been captured on film.
By the way, this book by Paul William Roberts is one of a very few that have actually changed the course of my life and my philosophy when I encountered it by chance in the mid 90′s. He traces the history of modern religions back through Zoroastrianism to the Vedas. That logically leads the intrepid seeker on back to shamanism. I highly recommend his book for its truly important insights, plus it is also a great travelogue and one of the most outrageously funny such books I’ve read.
As night fell, a lightning storm looming on the horizon provided the fireworks that further sparked our imaginations. We interpreted this moment as a sign, a metaphor, for what we captured in our energy bar. Raw, organic power and a simple, yet finely balanced force; an entire energy system designed to bring life and romance to an otherwise harsh and punishing environment. We had been touched by the Thunderbird and everything that it represents. Um, right.
Full Text Campaign Buzz March 6, 2012: Republican Presidential Candidate Mitt Romney’s Speech / Remarks to AIPAC American Israel Public Affairs Committee’s Policy Conference 2012 — Transcript Full Text Obama Presidency March 6, 2012: President Barack Obama’s Press Conference on Housing Mortgage Refinancing Plan & Potential Military Action Against Iran Full Text Campaign Buzz March 6, 2012: Newt Gingrich’s Super Tuesday Speech / Remarks after Winning in GOP / Republican Presidential Primary in Georgia Campaign Buzz March 6, 2012: Sarah Palin votes for Newt Gingrich at Alaska caucus — Will not rule out Presidential run “Anything is possible” Full Text Campaign Buzz March 6, 2012: Mitt Romney’s Speech / Remarks after Super Tuesday Victories in GOP / Republican Presidential Primaries Full Text Campaign Buzz March 6, 2012: Ron Paul’s Super Tuesday Speech / Remarks Full Text Campaign Buzz March 6, 2012: Rick Santorum’s Super Tuesday Speech / Remarks after Winning in GOP / Republican Presidential Primaries Tennessee, Oklahoma, North Dakota
Cooldown: 270 seconds.
“Pick yourself up, asshole.” He reaches down and lifts the man by his coat, pushes him against the wall and taking a few steps back. The man seems to stick there, snot running down his nose and his valuables arrayed around his feet. There’s blood there, and all down the man’s side as it runs from the bullet hole in his left arm. “How long have you been selling to teenagers?”
So it was “broader and ultimately incomprehensible?”
The term ‘Women’s Fiction’ will no longer be gracing WH Smith’s shelves after two customers complained to their chief executive Kate Swann, appealing to her ‘in sisterhood’ to remove the term. Teacher Julia Gillick and policy advisor Claire Leigh complained to WH Smith after spotting a stand branded ‘Women’s Fiction’, which they felt was outrageous and offensive. So, is the term Women’s Fiction offensive and demeaning to women or is it a handy label for shoppers to find books they like? (Taken from BBC website)
The ‘Miracle Berry’, Synsepalum dulcificum (Sapotaceae), may save your wallet and party! Buy the cheapest, sharpest and most awful wine you can get, eat a miracle berry and enjoy an exquisite and smooth vine!
5. Download a poetry app for your smartphone or tablet.
New paintwork colour scheme is pretty good as well ;-) Will post up some pictures tomorrow
“Helen”
Although, right now, we do have an extended house guest sleeping on the living room floor. He just moved to L.A. so we're trying to help him out by letting him stay here for awhile. Friends say I'm crazy, but... that's my life.
Just hanging by a moment (here with you)
To free up these old parts
Okay really, my appetite was really big then, I'm not even full after the meal! O_O
Garrison agreed to a field sobriety exercise, which he failed. He was arrested.
In multiplayer mode, get the Wario hat and grab a amateur by continuing next to them and try to bite them. Bandy them, and grab the brilliant that avalanche out of them, (If they accept a star). Aces the adversary up afresh and arena batter with them in your hands. They will bead accession star, even if they accept none in their count. Rinse and echo for as continued as you like.
A friend of mine got some heat recently for expressing her spiritual experience at a recent local concert. Today she shared some of the music with me that moved her as we traveled together to a gathering. We were busy catching up after a week of not seeing each other, and so I asked to borrow the CD overnight so I could better listen to it.
01. Real Terror feat. Mobonix
An interesting musical experiment, certainly, but perhaps Horslips diehards will be looking forward to the next full ‘rock-out’ gig.
Southern Man
Grilled Chicken Recipe:
Dusty In Bloom Evening Blush DA0808
Meanwhile, as the Tories fight each other and the economy dives, real people pay the price. Talking of plans, how about this one. It doesn’t cover media strategies but perhaps, boys, they are not really the biggest issue here?
The Occupy Earth encampment at the corner of Milton and Hecate in downtown Nanaimo has doubled in size, and is much better provisioned, than when I first visited the camp a few days ago. These little green dudes really know how to mount an occupation!
So and so became rich and is an atheist. So and so Christian became rich and shouts praise to God for making them rich.
Energized with the calm knowing
I'm pretty sure that it doesn't mean: "The act of spending eight years building a bunker with one way in and out, and then, after committing a heinous crime and disclosing the exact location of said bunker though poor opsec (operational security), giving up without even a token fight and shooting yourself in the head when the police show up."
The above context provides much for the USCCB to find wrong with all versions of the federal budget (and more so, for every federal budget ever produced). First, and of greatest significance, think Obamacare and abortion and ponder how that protects or threatens human life and dignity. But the USCCB also groused against proposed Administration cuts to “safe and affordable housing,” the DC Opportunity Scholarship Program, and “the entire foreign operations budget.”
Like the harvest moon, excitable, frizzy,
So there I was lying in bed this morning, half asleep; when suddenly, my senses were triggered by this auditory motion. Hmmm, what…could…it…be? At first it felt like a symphonic melody orchestrating a song just for me. I swear I had not taken anything the night before that would cause such disillusionment? Kidding. Then I realized, what I subliminally thought was a melody began to selectively piece itself into this boisterous cacophony that I could only wish would return itself back to it’s rightful dwellings. Hell, I would suppose. My quiet morning had been insulted; I had been insulted by this man’s voice. The origin of this absurd sound seemed to be coming from outside my bedroom window. I decided to take a glimpse, and there it was at a moment’s glance, my Armenian neighbor singing reprehensibly to an obnoxious song he so delightfully played for the entire waking universe to hear.
xoxo – Sarah Lee
QUICK CHANGE
The best part of Saturday night was all the left over food! We haven’t had to go grocery shopping yet!
1/2 cup sugar free choc chips (eg. Macro, Raw Foods)
In preparation for some chocolate mint cupcakes I'll be making tomorrow, I thought I'd attempt the tricky business of creating my chocolate mint leaves now. (to go on the top for decoration).
For every concern, I’d invent a crisis; and for every crisis, I’d invent the cause; Like shutting down entire industries and killing tens of thousands of jobs in the name of saving spotted owls. And when everyone learned the stunning irony that the owls were victims of their larger cousins—and not people—it would already be decades too late.
Se Na goes to a sauna with Park Ha and her mom and manages to get some hair from her sister.
"I couldn't have said it better old man!"
this can be interpreted however you want - an image with a cell phone/electronics, patterned paper with text/words on it, a long sentiment, a sentiment in "text speak" like LOL, etc....just have something to do with text!!
over and over dragging his bone over town.
How dare these people, or this journalist, talk about ‘EDL thugs’ when at this Al Quds demo Hamas, Hezbollah, Muslim Brotherhood and even al-Qaeda supporters, along with violent and totalitarian Trotskyists and Communists, will be mouthing off in their usual hyper-hypocritical manner?
Shari
a chance of surviving the wildfires.
This weekend we will have the “fun” job of filling the raised beds with topsoil. It will most likely take about 60 wheelbarrow loads so it will probably take us all weekend. The temperature is due to return to normal March levels at the weekend so at least we won’t be sweating in the sun while carting loads of soil back and forth.
But it appears there may be a problem after all. Well in certain quarters, anyway. MPs have always enjoyed 24hr cheap booze in the parliament bars and it was with some reluctance that they allowed the plebs the benefits of deregulated licensing. After all, who are we to be entrusted with such dangers? So it’s with no little irony I read about Eric Joyce and his antics in the Strangers Bar of the House of Commons.
During the portion of the show where the one-time Republican presidential candidate takes questions from viewers, Robertson was asked what advice a man should give to a friend who began seeing another woman after his wife started suffering from the incurable neurological disorder.
Moving on to the Welsh Government’s science investment announcements, they look good on paper but how long before the economic benefits will be seen? And no one should be remotely surprised by the horrible GDP figures they have been so bad for so long because the money has been wasted on Ministerial pet projects that its a sad fact of life West Wales and the Valleys are so poor and will remain that way for many years to come.
A tad sweeter, but still dry, and more serious too – this is an unoaked example, but the richness of the variety and that delicate spice is balanced superbly by quite high acidity for a Viognier.
Normal service will resume tomorrow though.
From our Association’s perspective, education is the best investment we can make. Education leads to higher wages and increased employment stability for individuals, higher property values, and towns and cities that are attractive to employers. It results in a skilled workforce that will compete in a global economy.
Something you're not wearing: socks
Script Frenzy ends tomorrow. As of this moment I have 75 pages of the 100 pages required to “win.” There is only the smallest of chances that I will finish by midnight tomorrow, but I’m going to be plugging away at it until the fat lady sings. And whether I am an official “winner” or not, I’m going to finish this screenplay. I’m very proud of the idea that I came up with and the way that it has moved along, even with all the stumbling blocks along the way. I’ll finish this screenplay. Maybe not tomorrow, but very soon. And then the re-writes will begin.
The safehouses were dramatically scaled back in 1962, following a report by CIA Inspector General John Earman that strongly recommended closing the facility. The San Francisco safehouses were closed in 1965, and the New York City safehouse soon followed in 1966. (Link)
For now I will sit in the park, clear my mind, and ask what to do. I don’t know who I ask, or where the answer comes from. (Most of the time its my husband – don’t tell him but he is pretty smart guy) I often trust my intuition on things and I know that this will work out. I am choosing to charge on and take organizing this 5km run/walk head on. It’s going to take up my time I will have to adjust my business schedule and sacrifice time with my family. BUT I refuse to give up and crawl into a pile of nachos (where a month ago you would have found me)
Stravinskian techno. Doesn't sound very zippy, huh?! But you'll change your mind after just a few notes, if you happen to listen to "Il tagliacode". The album's one of those jazzy, abstract, broken-beat-based acoustic/electronic hybrids which often go under the name "intelligent dance music"; unlike most of the music in the genre, though, crebrality's not the first trait emerging from its complexity. On the contrary, the main impression is lightness - which doesn't mean silliness: the music still sounds very classy, even "aristocratic", and the evident complexity of its rhythms clearly cuts out any connection with italo-disco's flippancy; instead of trampling the listener with mind-blowing rhythm discharges, though, the tracks catch him in carefully-built tech-house grooves, abstract-yet-airy lounge tunes mixing live instrumentation, glitchy exotica/soundtrack suggestions and acid electro basslines. It almost sounds like a 21st Century reworking of the old "library music" concept. You could imagine the result as some sort of Amon Tobin/Akufen meeting point, but much less ostentatiously "intellectual" than both. The best thing you can do's anyway checking out a couple of tracks ("Uova di gatto" and "Vodkatronic" for instance).
2 skin
At 21, what I wanted was to have a job and be in a relationship. There was no savouring of any moment and there was no self discovery involved. It more about the being in a job than what the job was, and more about the relationship than who the relationship was with.
To learn more about genetically engineered foods, I highly recommend the following films and lectures:
these blue cotton shorts, with the elastic waistband. I loved em. I definitely knew I could run faster at recess wearing those than in my dumb jean shorts. As soon as mom did some wash, those puppies were on and I was off to the races. One day, at recess, this girl that bothered me sooooooo much, pants-ed me. I was wearing those shorts. Not only did she get the shorts off, but my ninja turtle underwear as well. I've never pulled my pants up so fast. Well the next day, just to be careful, I wore overall's to school. No way that sucker was gonna get me again! Guess what I wore everyday for the rest school year. Yep. Overalls.
30 rue Pierre Fontaine
To an objective observer, it might seem difficult to accept that populism is a central problem in a country whose constitution enshrines—even reveres—an appropriate form of populism. America’s founding documents espouse government “of the people, by the people, and for the people.” And yet, one of America’s many intriguing ironies is that its current public discourse is increasingly besieged and obscured by competing versions of people-versus-the-elite populist caricatures. These negative caricatures are nowhere better demonstrated than in the vitriol of the presidential election campaign.
We are SO privileged to live in a time, in a country, in a culture that allows us opportunity to stretch ourselves in the direction of our dreams..... the question is are you prepared to go to that vulnerable place?
In the 'new' bathroom
Huh. What a strange show, and how very contradictory it is! I despised the meanness of the sibling-villains, but then I nearly died laughing at the sight of a Joseon-era prince standing under an awning by a modern 7-11, just to escape the rain. Basically, the ultra dark format of Episode 1 lost me entirely, while the light fluffiness of Episode 2 won me over entirely. Oh, please, let's totally forget about the mystery plots and just stick with Park Ha and the baffled historical guys in 2012? If we focus more on the funny and less on the pain, Rooftop Prince will turn out fine.
Then I worked a couple hours getting my planters filled and then had a nice rain on them
flying by on bat-wings
Physicians should consider the opportunity cardiac risk of sexual acts in patients using pre-existing cardiovascular disease. Sexual activity features a potential cardiac danger for patients together with pre-existing heart disease.
Particularly terrible is the dialogue for female characters in Turtles all the Way. In case you couldn’t tell so far, I’m a dude. The female dialogue is so unrealistic that it hurts. Well, more like the romance-related lines and the hyper girl… which is odd, since I was usually a hyper weirdo since I was put into the enhanced program until I finished high school. I mean, of course I’m going over all of it as much as possible to make it sound better, but it still doesn’t sound quite right, and I’m not friends with any girls, so I can’t get that checked out… Well, I know one, but she had to leave the project some time ago due to a tight schedule year-round, so she couldn’t even help in the summer. In fact, she left saying it was for the good of the project, since she wanted to help but didn’t want to slow us down. If only everyone could be that considerate.
Almost as good is Shiner's Kolsch. It's not a Pilsner — Kolsch is a German style that the website says was created as an alternative to Pilsner. It's also a real pick-me-up when you're dripping with sweat. Highly recommended when you've fired up the grill, or just finished mowing. (Or both, as was the case with me today.) Dammit, I was about to go to bed, but thinking about it is making me want another one. And speaking of rapidly expanding portfolios, has anybody noticed how Shiner has just taken off? And how all their new experiments just put Shiner Bock to shame?
27 - Experience is something you don't get until just after you need it.
2. Decide what shapes you want to make. Use the internet for ideas. I like to cut out shapes from cardboard cereal boxes (easier to trace). Some designs I have made are birds, guitars, elephants, whales, guitars, hammers, cowboy boots, LOVE.... The sky's the limit!
my hand in yours
Now for my questions. Answer them very, very carefully. You will be graded.
Borlee won the bronze medal in Daegu, but his wins were in unimpressive meets in Izmir, Madrid, and Budapest in a 3 – 8 season. IN addition, he lost to Brown in New York and London. Makng this one of those times when the Circuit outweighed Worlds for me.
Level 16: STR: +48, Increases your attack speed.
63. If it startd to rain, would you come under my unbrella? +
I was able to attend two of such gatherings during the last weekend. One was a documentary screening and the other one was a talk i attended. Both will have their separate entries.
"I don't read as much as I'd like. I have way too many books collecting dust on my shelves."
In this slow, simmering stew comes the first Full Moon of spring, on Friday. The Libra Full Moon spotlights our social connections, agreements, responsibilities and obligations. How are they faring? How’s the reciprocity? How far have you come in winding up old business and patterns, renegotiating or clearing out unworkable situations and firming up mutually beneficial arrangements? (My moon cast will be up on the site Thursday.)
We began opening all of the windows and trying to turn off the fire alarms which were blaring by this point- good to know they worked.
As the central figure for his works, Ian Fleming created the fictional character of James Bond, an intelligence officer in the Secret Intelligence Service, commonly known as MI6. Bond was also known by his code number, 007, and was a Royal Navy Reserve Commander.
Then fight, (O Muhammad pbuh), in the Cause of Allah, you are not tasked (held responsible) except for yourself, and incite the believers (to fight along with you), it may be that Allah will restrain the evil might of the disbelievers. And Allah is Stronger in might and Stronger in punishing. (V.4:84).
4 Let's put it this way: A while ago, I was excited to discover this web site called What Goes On that exhaustively catalogs what it calls "anomalies" in every released Beatles song. The fact that the site is named after one of my least-liked Beatles songs turned out to be an omen. Because unless you care that there are, e,g., "Offbeat clicks, left channel" at the 1:08-1:11 mark of "Baby You're a Rich Man", you're not gonna gain any insights from this site, largely because there are none to be had. The fact that Ringo's bass drum pedal can be heard squeaking on more songs than I care to list is about as interesting, to me, as the continuity errors that Trekkie retards endlessly offer up as Gotcha!s when they attend a Trek Convention, the point of doing which seems to be to assert, See, Gene Roddenberry? I'm smarter than you! No wonder you're dead and I'm not! But really, who the fuck cares?
“The current industry agreement with the Government is unsustainable, has thwarted choice for consumers, and is past its ‘best by’ date.”
First of all from day one you just knew it was going to be a great musical. We encountered a lot of trouble on the road with it – and we weren’t well-received. Well, we were by the audiences but not by the critics. But you just knew it would turn out to be a great musical – and it did. So there was that feeling, which is extraordinary. And then Jerry Robbins – he really pulled it through and worked very hard on it. Eight weeks of rehearsal in New York, eight weeks on the road. That was before you had to have a day off. Sixteen weeks and I think he only gave us three days off. But he used that time. He kept working on it and refining it and trying things out – and he gradually crystallized it. That was pretty exciting to see him do that. He was a giant.
-Brandon
- Hold the cheese, sour cream and avocado/guac (avocados are healthy, but are high in calories which you won't want with a meal that's already bursting at the seams!)
Of course, all these vignettes give me ideas and ideas are good when you’re writing a work of fiction. But as a caveat, it’s distracting when you have your whole book planned out and you don’t need any more scenes or walk on characters. More importantly, I don’t like to be the subject of someone else’s curiosity.
Kathryn Bechen is an award-winning professional writer whose articles have appeared in popular national and regional magazines and newspapers. She specializes in lifestyle feature articles and has also published several organizing and decorating e-books. The lifestyle companies she founded, Organized with Ease and Kathryn Bechen Designs, have served clients worldwide. Bechen has organized and decorated 13 personal small space residences together with her husband Steve. They currently live in their favorite small space ever: a 1,200-square-foot high-rise apartment in beautiful San Diego, California. She blogs about timely lifestyle topics at www.KathrynBechenINK.com.
Then she solemnly spoke toward me,
My logic being, if the fries were crap, the chances were the rest of the food wasn't that amazing.
I am probably the only person in the world who hasn't seen the tv show. I have heard of it though and knew what it was about. I am one of these sad folk that would rather try out the books first. It may just be the tiredness talking at this point but it annoyed me quite a bit. First of all Dexter doesn't just come across as your cold serial killer. He is supposed to be soulless and dead inside. Instead he comes across as smug and arrogant. There is a very tiny part of him that worries about what his father would have thought. Without that he probably would go ahead and kill everyone. Then there is his sister Deborah who relies so heavily on Dexter to help her. Surely at some point she would have to stand on her two feet? She just doesn't seem to have what it takes to get very far in her chosen career other than ambition. In all honesty she doesn't seem all to bright.
“As we came out of the tavern, at about 7.50pm, these two men were standing at the car,” recalled Lamula.
But I knew too that on that day, she needed a friend to step outside the rules. And give her a moment of honesty. So that she would know that someone knew. And really, honestly cared. And really, honestly was a friend that would help her, if she ever asked for help. That she’d needed something more than just a social behavior pattern. That she’d needed something real. In a land of professional, grown-up behavior. In a world where feelings have no place.
I didn't argue.
into gardens of compassionate courage…
But tell her if she's gotta think: think lilac!!
These were executed very well -
there were people in my life -
Solution: Develop an Operations and Training Manual: How-to: manual that describes in great detail everything that a person needs to know about how to do their job effectively and takes them through a focused training process
So now what?
"When the Cambrian measures were forming, they promised perpetual peace,
Whisk flour, sugar, and salt in medium bowl to blend. Add butter and rub in with fingertips until mixture resembles coarse crumbs. Add 2 tablespoons ice water; stir until dough clumps together, adding more ice water by teaspoonfuls if dough is dry. Gather dough into ball; flatten into disk. Wrap in plastic and chill at least 2 hours. Keep chilled. Let dough soften 10 minutes at room temperature before rolling out.
Again it seemed that aged fox,
It’s interesting that there are questions she will not answer, questions to which she simply says, “No, I’m not going to answer that.”
James wasn’t remotely impressed. He didn’t want to be a conundrum; he wanted the magic wand of medicine. He wanted to jump up and walk out cured, like the guy in the Bible. Dr B would make a cracking Jesus, come to think of it – he’s got the bone structure and does a good line in pithy comments. But he’s not hot on miracles. Instead he told James exactly what the apostle St Google had already told me – do the exercises, rest, get some orthotics.
“Grain”
And in the article it is made abundantly clear that the South African government has committed itself to uphold the SADC tribunal ruling. And the ruling was in favor of Michael Campbell and 78 Zimbabwean farmers that the land reform program in Zimbabwe was “racist and unlawful”
What is inferentialism?
Now on to the Scavenger Hunt! There are 12 design team members and each of us have a question that will give you clues to 12 different items that you can find in the Crafter's Companion Store.
In his review for the article, Garrett Oliver, who is an internationally recognized expert on beer, brewmaster of the Brooklyn Brewery and author of The Brewmaster’s Table observed: “This beer has an attractive orange-amber color underneath a tight, off-white foam. The aroma is earth, nutty, and musty, with mild notes of fruit and mint. The bitterness stands up front on the palate, broad and brash, before the full-bodied malts pull the beer back into balance. Hop bitterness lingers after a long finish.”
So, in line with my normal Monday posts, here is a quote that I just found:
Special Days in May:
571 D-IV/17(A)/1968. “The Passion of Greece Today.” Chicago Council on Foreign Relations,
Betty shakes her head and walks way to serve a rather pissed looking Roy Orbison.
Each five-card, 10-pack box of 2011-12 Rookie Anthology will deliver one Rookie Treasures dual-memorabilia autographed RC (numbered to 499, 199 or 99), one additional autograph card and two memorabilia cards. Meanwhile, each 12-box case should yield one Luxury Suite RC numbered to 99, two to three Limited Phenoms autographed RCs, one autographed Ice Breaker parallel and one of the following (either a Rookie Silhouette numbered to 99, a Prime Rookie Silhouette numbered to 25 or a Rookie Treasures Patch numbered to 15).
...So by historic standards, Romney is within the ballpark of what one would expect from a non-incumbent candidate who goes on to win his party’s nomination. The truth of the matter is that Mitt Romney is winning against a very good field of candidates- a two-term Senator who is a gifted speaker and has a solid person life named Rick Santorum (a resume that is superior to President Obama in 2008), a former Speaker of the House of Representatives named Newt Gingrich (a resume that is superior to President Obama in 2008), and a long-time Congressman who is a veteran and doctor and has a committed following (a resume that is superior to President Obama in 2008). And Romney has already knocked out of the race several other good candidates- the Governor of booming Texas named Rick Perry (who has a resume that was superior to President Obama in 2008) and a former Governor and Ambassador named John Huntsman (who has a resume that was superior to President Obama in 2008).
This is really a great money-saving psychological device, also because there's often no follow-up. I don't go LOOKING for potholders, for example....
"Love is a song that never ends"
Came two young lovers lately wed.
And Terrelle and his wife want something good to come out of their tragedy.
What a startling person Barack is—so strange to voice intimations of my own perceptions—have them heard, responded to so on the sleeve. A sadness, in a way, that we are both so questioning that original bliss is dissipated—but feels really good not to be faltering behind some façade—to not feel that doubt must be silenced and transmuted into distance.
Instead of the usual mini pic-tutorial that comes on the back of these palettes, this one’s got tutorials in words! Those of you who reach Chinese will be able to see the two different looks they recommend you.
What spurred his sexist anti-female essay? His assertion that females have no right to discuss gender and its relationship to our women’s liberation movement, and his complaint about such a previous discussion hosted on the Ms. Blog here: http://msmagazine.com/blog/blog/2012/03/20/future-of-feminism-transfeminism-and-its-conundrums
Last winter I vowed not to endure the dreary months of January and February in North Carolina, so when my friends Ramelle and Michael Pulitzer of New View Tours sent me their itineraries, I jumped on The High Sierra Tour.
COLM O CIOSOIG : drums
Mix the lime juice and sugar together to dissolve the latter, add the rum, pour it over a combination of crushed and cubed ice and shake for about twice as long as you would normally. Strain it into a chilled martini glass.
I fail to recognize me of old… the Brad of the past, that innocent kid who lived a sheltered life playing with toys under the dining room table older than probably all of my friends combined. The greatest journey is the journey of self… If I could meet myself, what would I say to him, what would I warn him of? Would I even bother? Possibly nothing, life isn’t life without the battles to conquer… What is love without pain, what is life without death, what is triumph without failures, what is creation without destruction?
U.S.
Who woke up to find that God had found those 23 sponsors within 24 hours? This sister.
The step-by-step was a good start, but I want more info. Whatcha got?
Perhaps the question for the Republican Party is this, as it “moves to de-centralize the federal government does it want to centralize its power”? The question then becomes as we de-centralize the federal government do we want the political parties to become more centralized in power? Will the members of the GOP be willing to accept a centralized party which will in turn give us a more centralized government controlled by centralized parties?
I can’t believe that I’m almost done with this semester of school. What I find even more shocking is the relative ease of getting back into the swing of things. I thought after I’d been diagnosed that my ability to do well at college would be diminished. I guess that may be a part of why I waited so long to go back. I’m not entirely sure, but I think it might have something to do with it. I’m in the midst of final exams, and luckily, they’re all take home finals. They kind of have to be considering I’ve never stepped foot on campus, other than when I initially bought my books. I couldn’t believe my shock and pride when I checked my grade online, I didn’t really expect to see it since I just took the exam yesterday, but I passed with a 97%!! I’m flying high right now. I still can’t believe that I managed to do so well!
I couldn’t help sniggering at Cocteau’s dogged inflexibility, which caused the humans to look at me in surprise. “This is no matter for amusement, Mr Bananas,” said Cocteau sternly. “If you have information on this case it is your duty to expose it to me.”
Through it you are also being saved,
Joe and I met in Maryland when I was still in college. Joe was a very frugal and average-earning civil servant (NASA engineer), socking away every penny, weighing every purchase. Keeping the thermostat low and combining car trips to save gas. Buying groceries discounted for age or condition. Doing all his own oil changes and most auto repairs. Saving money in hundreds of non-glamorous ways. He planned to retire from working at 40. He was completely confident in this goal.
Adela can be emailed at: creationsbyar at sbcglobal dot net
-Liability issues if the child gets into trouble
We were camping when the bombs hit, and not even to try and escape them. It was a last minute decision.
Perry, whose cv includes the killing of an innocent man and a prayer based solution to drought, might now have gone poof not for the saying and doing of many awful things, but through the non-saying of one thing, a mistake that many who have spoken in public may well have made. That this will be Perry’s heel, demonstrates the overwhelming emphasis on the ceremonial aspect of the presidency in this ongoing speaking contest, the ceremonial, and nothing else. Perry’s fatal flaw has not been one of his many terrible plans, but that he has made himself look so ridiculous that his indignity has splattered on his supporters, like any singer whose fans flee after her habits have become so debased that she’s unable to lip sync properly.
Although that helps and matters more than Ben can say, he still isn't ready to join up with the rest of the castaways. He still has some things he needs to work out, "I think I'll stay here a while."
Teenagers are prone to acne breakouts, and teen facials are designed especially for skin types that most acne prone teenagers have to treat the condition the best way possible. The whole concept of teen facials is that the facial technician will flush out all of the toxins embedded in skin to clean it out, which helps clear out congealed dirt particles under the topmost layers of the skin, and can assist in hindering hormonal breakout by improving blood circulation.
Last year's pick included two Springbanks, a 14 year old Madeira barrel and a 13 year old bourbon barrel aged. I was most interested in the bourbon barrel. Springbank is one of those distilleries with a cult-following, maybe not to the extent of Ardbeg, but pretty close. Personally, while I've enjoyed some Springers, I've never understood the devotion to the distillery. I just haven't had that many Springbanks that I've loved. I was particularly interested in this bourbon barrel expression because I always think it's interesting to try bourbon aged versions of malts that are more typically sherried. Once you peel away those bold sherry notes, what's left?
But what if you are wrong, Mr. Hitchens? Perhaps you will say you can still do good things without faith, but you will get tired of it if there’s nothing in it for you. In time, it will seem completely illogical and futile to be kind or humanitarian if this world will never get better, unless you can find a way to gain something by your charitable deeds.
Naturally everyone asks us what we are most looking forward to about Australia and also what we will miss the most from France. Outside of friends and family (and the friends part applies for both sides!) and the ease of travel the answer, unsurprisingly, is food.
SCHLESSINGER: Yes, they did.
17And the Spirit and the bride say, Come. And let him that heareth say, Come. And let him that is athirst come. And whosoever will, let him take the water of life freely.
Laughs maniacally while saying, "Man, I really had you going! You shoulda seen the looks on your faces!"
Rest in Peace Man in Black.......
I will never be able to download anything off the internet if I become a lawyer! NEVER EVER again.
Laundry lists of character traits.
Dear Chickadees,
Next stop was Banila Co, one of my favorite Korean cosmetics brand. They’re touted as the Benefit of Korea, and are priced slightly higher than other brands such as Skinfood/The Face Shop/Holika Holika. I’ve purchased and enjoyed many of their products in the past, so I was really excited to visit their store in Myeongdong. I made my rounds in the gorgeously decorated store, and found these products in my basket. lol.. The It Natural BB Cream and Prime Primer Hydrating seemed to be the newest releases as they were prominently displayed in the store. I really liked their let me bebe BB cream so I wanted to give this new release a try. I also do enjoy their eyeshadow palettes, which are often LE, so I took this opportunity to pick up a few of those still available. These are great for travelling as they are so compact and comes in a great range of shades.
Egypt Independent reported that following today’s withdrawal of Al-Ahzar‘s sole representative from the constituent assembly, the FJP yielded 10 of its own seats to liberal appointees. Speaking to Egypt Independent, Moety Bayoumy, a member of the university’s Islamic Research Academy, had admonishing words for the Muslim Brotherhood:
The third group is is the conspiracy theorists, who are the angels of light in the world, uncovering the mass conspiracy which is occurring. It makes them feel good about themselves, that they have seen through the veil.
He also says that “Jesus is integral to God’s own identity.”
When I posted Hilda’s story on Facebook, one of my friends said, “She must have a destiny to fulfill…” Maybe she’s right. Since she’s not filling a grave or someone’s stomach, maybe I could make a little patch for Hilda’s eye and she’ll enjoy fame and fortune as a chicken pirate. Or perhaps her story will make headlines and she’ll start demanding a new nesting box, green grapes and pasta every day.
Imagine someone having spent a lifetime robbing a country blind; or actually having blood on their hands from all the dirty deeds you have done.
B watched the movie Once the other night (he was having a camp out in the playhouse with the kids and watched it on his laptop while they were sleeping....yes, it is about 84 degrees right now during the day and the nights have been blissfully warm!) He immediately had me come watch a few of his favorite parts with him after it ended. The next night, he insisted we watch it together.
As a result, this is a beer that actually might benefit from some aging. But as far as I can tell, the only way to get one is to buy the entire box set, and if you're like us that means you'll want to drink them all at once. Drinking them separately.. well that makes no sense. Kinda like that 12 Days of Christmas song.
Then, they cast off their clothes. This refers to their outer garments, coats and the like for they were preparing to stone Paul. This, according to Deuteronomy 13:5, 9, 10, was the legal method of execution according to Jewish law.
“If I were a gorilla, would you want me to be your mate?”
Recently, I stumbled upon this article called MITO-CONUNDRUM:Unraveling Environmental Effects on Mitochondria- which was all about toxins and how they affect this little organelle they call the mitochondria. Lo and behold I read this paragraph:
A mothers heart is a patch work of love.
because blogging is my thing. it is my outlet to write and type and explore. to pick up creative ideas and read inspiring stories to be a better wife, friend, teacher, etc.
Defeat is no longer a choice for me
1. Cassie Stuart (1986) – She did a pretty good job as Isabella, even if there were moments when she came off as a bit . . . well, theatrical. I only wish that the one of the crew had taken it easy with her makeup.
Some girls don’t understand this, because they wear dresses (some girls go to the extreme of not owning jeans – I think they might be another life form to be honest with you). I see dresses and think “that’s pretty” but then subconsciously cling to my jeans. I get invitations to formal things, like weddings, and I wish just once someone would tell me it’s casual attire so I could wear my jeans and sneakers. I’m just that type of person.
Secondly he had to contend with the fact that the faction that won the recent SUPP party election (in December 2011) by default is not aligned to him. The new party president is federal minister Peter Chin who is seen to be aligned to Prime Minister Najib Tun Razak.
Best of all was the great help from the groomsmen. After a major treadmill accident a couple of weeks ago, I still wasn't up to doing all the heavy lifting myself (it's hard for me to accept help with the harp, but that's what pain will do to a normally strong and capable harpist...).
Photo with compliments of Showhomes Minneapolis Design Team – Woodland home…
and shielded soles.
You however, have lifted my heart, dried my tears and given me strength to carry on. All of your wonderful check-ins and well wishes have touched my heart, thank you.
Leora
“Oh uncle, real soon”
- TurretinFan
Wheatley
The Austin Statesman and other news outlets today reported that the Senate has severed Williamson County DA John Bradley's nomination from other members of the Forensic Science Commission because Democrats have enough votes to block him from being considered on the floor under the Texas Senate's 2/3 rule and have told the chair of the Nominations Committee they intend to do so.
As i draw close to the guarded gate
Planting the seeds
I fill up a fermenting bin with water from a water butt and then add litre bottles of ice for the last 30 minutes or so of the boil. The chiller goes into the wort for the last 15-20 minutes as usual to kill off any nasties and then the pump is switched on when the boiler is switched off.
give the gift of these thoughtfully captured moments of the culture, color and details uniquely known to various locations in spain!
'No one's under house arrest,' the hapless spokesman protests. 'Maurice is confined to his home for security reasons.'
In case you have been hiding underneath a rock like I have, most of your probably already know about the greatness that is the Teacher Appreciation Jackpot! If you want grades 3-6, you just need to hop over to Corkboard Connections and see all the fabulous bloggers that are giving away soo many freebies.
Now I remember the number one thing that triggered this lame post; I really like soccer! I'm so happy when the World Cup is on because then I can watch the matches without having to explain myself.
Announced at HP Labs in Palo Alto, Calif., HP says production of the new ARM-powered servers is slated for the second half of 2012 and delivered to select customers. Still, the company clearly believes there’s a market for ARM-powered server now in the future.
fluids.However, couples can experience empty exchanges, where one feels empty, lonely,
"Do you know why runners drink water? Because they run out of running power."
So in my quest to diminish and actually use my stash I have made another card in the same color palette/same papers as the Sweet Pea-EB Stamp. This is using a Mo digital with it though. The card was cut out from a Cricut Cartridge-Wild Card and then I embellished it with the rest. The stars are Chipboard and then I got these cool embellishments from Inky Impressions. Sentiment is from a Close to My Heart Stamp Set.
Today my Christopher turned 4 1/2, and I know I've already posted about our half-birthday tradition, but I just wanted to share pictures. This time I made a 9x13 cake, cut it in half and layered it, frosted 3 sides and the top and wrote half of each word on top for his half birthday. The kids thought it was funny.
Prompt payouts.
And it is these “While you were out” moments that bother me. No, I can’t explain it any better than I can explain away a debilitating fear of spiders or fear of bad mayo when there’s no mayo within five miles. Perhaps a relative was killed by a marauding mayo packet when I was a kid or something.
Sometimes in waiting God speaks to us best...so next time you are impatiently waiting, don't be so impatient, it may be the best time you have all day. Hopefully we can grow to a place in our faith where we don't have to be in a waiting room to actually wait.
Every part of your personality is trying to help you to be the person you want to be. Accept all of it. You may not like all that you are, but it’s necessary to accept that part of yourself before you can change it. Figure out what the parts of yourself that you don’t like are trying to help you accomplish. Sometimes it’s pushing people away to feel safe or it could be standing up for yourself in an aggressive way to get respect. There is always a reason behind the behavior.
I'm surprised I lived to see a female and a black man run or president seriously and one of them actually win and I am still soo disappointed that skin color and sexual identity makes a difference. Finally, I am surprised at 44 years on the planet that people who are in so much fear just end up being mean ole doodooheads.
15. Homme Fort
He hangs his coat on the hook while she fusses in the kitchen. He hasn’t the heart to tell her that he’s already eaten. The meat sits heavy in his stomach making him full, sluggish, as he loosens his tie and sits down, ready to do his best.
If you think you can’t, you can’t
Once again, there is no pressure to create both pieces but you are more than welcome to do so.
RR: What are your future plans for Light Bulb Alley and how can people access your music?
So who’s going to take the lead? We expect this to be the ISO (International Organization for Standardization) after DIN submitted its standard proposal in December 2007.
Dessert was then chocolate and key lime pie from Nigella Kitchen, which is another great cookbook from Nigella. I’d like to point out that there is absolutely nothing nutritional about this dessert apart form the lime juice, which lets face it once mixed with double cream and evaporated milk, then placed into a pie crust made up of butter, digestive biscuits, cocoa powder and choc chips, has lost all of its citrussy goodness. But if you eat dessert for its nutritional qualities, then what the hell are you eating for junk food??? The lime stands up to all the other ingredients though and the filling tastes really zingy and is also super smooth and delicious. The pie crust, while nice did not set very well and ended up crumbling everywhere and became rubble next to the filling. Three slices are still sitting in the fridge and I just know I am going to cave in soon and grab one. It would be rude not to.
This was a small batch, since I am still learning about canning, I didn't want to use up all my blueberries, plus we still wanted some for things like snacks and blueberry pancakes.
especially the little brown one who is named Mocha.
with tattoos
It's been re-furbished in the last few years to become a bright, modern, open-plan establishment with one half setup mainly for drinkers on comfy sofas & wooden tables and the other set aside for the classy food. As well as a long list of coffees, wine and bottled beer, the 'craft' beer choice was really impressive today with a great selection from Williams Brothers (Joker), Tempest (Rye PA & Into the Light), Cromarty (Red Rocker), Black Isle (Export Scotch) and Magic Rock (Curious & Carnival) with the Carnival being a really full-on citrus flavoured beer, with some caramel malt, but if anything just slightly too bitter (I don't say that too often and would probably be willing to re-consider if I have it again outside in a beer garden!). They were also promoting their Summer Wine Brewery Dinner/Food and Beer matching evening - I've never been to one of these and really must try one sometime soon. I guess The Caley really is a cutting-edge contemporary pub/bar/restaurant, with something to offer a whole range of differing clientèle - so much so that it's been deemed to be worthy of a place in the 2012/13 The List Eating and Drinking Guide to Edinburgh - congratulations!
I went vegan for ethical reasons. (And to impress my hot vegan boyfriend at the time. So shoot me.) I thought about it deeply and felt that, if I were on a desert island alone with my dog, I would probably have to eat her. But not being on a desert island, I was privileged to not have to eat my dog, or any other animal. I always could, but I don't have to. So why should I contribute to a system that harms the planet, causes unspeakable cruelty to living beings, and facilitates human rights abuses on labor?
March 29th:
(which I really really love!)
yay for Daddy Love:)))
In case you are thinking about this particular as a fun at vacations, it is recommended to look with regard to simple types of REMOTE CONTROL cars. However , if this seems like a critical hobby to you, you need to certainly explore. It is far from hard to learn the operating associated with REMOTE CONTROL cars. Together with training, you are able to take advantage of your fluency.
“Can I speak to Master Vallore?” Addison narrowed her eyes on her fingernail as she picked at it, not able to sit still.
Opening the Program
Bestfriend got these through her work –and gave them to me!! She is SO wonderful like that and I’m SO grateful to have such a thoughtful bestie.
I'm back, it's been a while! I finally managed to hand in my project and the feeling of relief and freedom is hitting me right about now... I should probably be kicking back with a puzzle or something as mind-numbing to tone down the stress levels, but instead I just landed in Turkey! I was planning somewhat of a holiday to company my boyfriend who is playing a golf tournament, but I managed to book a lookbook shoot and a big feature post for the week of my stay, to not give myself too much free time. But so many posts to catch up on to apologize for my absence one outfit at the time...
Anyway, she said Bernestein wanted her and excited about news she was almost shaking. I prepared her tea and said I would support her till the end.
Then you and momma split for the last time. We had to move, but you stayed. For over three years you stayed in that house. A house I would find hard myself to call home, but you managed to stay. My sister and I thought of you everyday. Thought of what you were doing, if you missed us like we missed you… We ignored the people who would go on and on, “Your daddy doesn’t love you, if he loved you why doesn’t he call or try to see you?” While we knew you loved us, we didn’t know those people would not let you get into contact with us. The Day finally came however, we got to see you again. And it wasn’t too long and we were moving back to the south.
On Wednesday 4 April, a flood of pictures went on Twitter as people
Thank you again for all your support and wonderful comments. Wishing all of you a truly wonderful new year from me, ickle, & Lardee!
I just slipped home from spending the night at the home of my slightly over-whelmed daughter. She recently gave birth to her third baby-- a dark-haired, dark-eyed charmer named Wesley, who arrived slightly three years after the the births of his two "older" siblings, thus the reason she is slightly overwhelmed. Some people cast troubled glances at her as if she didn't understand how this phenomenon occurred. She knows. She just has a precarious health issue, and God knew her family should come quickly while she was enjoying great health.
Anyhow, this one is a definite keeper that I will be making often. If you like pizza this one is a must try.
Here's what I've come up with for our "school":
Also, the Castro and Obama governments, they are sparring over
"Arnold J. ... ruled that the Motion Picture Association (MPA), supported by the creative industries, has won an order requiring BT to block access to the pirate website Newzbin2. The site makes unlawful copies of films and television programmes, alongside other content from games, publishers and music available without permission in direct violation of a previous court order against it. Around 700,000 members use the Newzbin service generating the operators in excess of £1 million per year. This verdict will prevent the site from using BT’s internet service to make money through copyright infringement.
Why must we interfere in the way other leaders run their countries? When did we begin to think “international leadership” equates to global dictatorship? If we agree with Mr. Washington’s advice and Mr. Jefferson’s example, then there is no justification for a diplomatic double standard. To get around this, however, American politicians simply pretend it doesn’t exist. None of our officials is hesitant to pay bribes to foreign thugs from money extorted from American taxpayers, or borrowed from other tyrants.
extender for holding small leftover pencils
Yesterday I was happily surprised to find that the Indieful ROK Twitter account had gained over 1000 followers. Follower #1000 was none other than Gwangju's indie rock band SPthe#, and since long having yet to be implemented ideas for IROK about covering indie acts from outside of Seoul better I decided this was the perfect pretext to ask for an interview. SPthe# leader and vocalist Junghee was fast to respond not only to my inquiry for an interview but also to the questions that followed:
Landon was moving to fast at the zoo to ever get him in any of my masterpiece iPhone photos, but he very carefully posed for this one so you could see his new Captain America shoes that make him run SUPER SPEEDY FAST. (We took our first ever trip to the local mall today to get the kids shoes. I no longer feel like a bad mother for having a new walk-in shower while my kids toes poke out of their shoes.)
I also thought, “We have got to get the folks who organize the KBON party to let us serve our biere next year.” It is the kind of beer that goes with the foods the vendors were selling, it lubricates the French speaking and 2-stepping muscles and is the
“March 2006: Canada was the first country (after Israel) to cut its assistance to the Palestinian Authority. The aid cutoff, which was designed to sow division within Palestinian society, had devastating social effects.”
Moving stinks. There are great parts about it. But it's hard. And it never seems to get easier. I should know. In my 33 years on this earth, I have moved 12 times. If you weren't a math major, that averages out to every 2.75 years. That's a lot. My family is NOT a military family, either!
You know the little voice that tells you in the middle of a conversation that you are having with someone that you are a lot smarter than they are? Perhaps it’s hubris, but it happens on occasion. I have recently recovered from breast cancer. I’m on the other side of this deal now, having finished radiation a couple months ago. Now, when people I know (or people of people I know) get a new diagnosis of breast cancer, I contact them and at least lend an ear, share my experience and listen to theirs. I feel like it’s the least I can do, because no one can really do jack shit for someone who has cancer other than be a friend. I had long-lost friends and new friends check in with me during my cancer experience and it meant a lot. Thus, I commence with my do-gooding. Only, the old adage, “no good deed goes unpunished” starts replaying in my head as the following conversation unfolds.
Do not overbake. Do not overeat.
ride the sky
What do you want – a cliff over a city?
serious business there, must
Crouching low
Since I begun my work with Gratitude, I’ve learnt a lot about the gap of knowledge between being in Gratitude and BEING GRATITUDE!!
Its a new app! Ok your thinking a new app? Who cares? Not this time! This app is special and wonderful and one that all parents should hear about! Its a stop texting app! The app is called Life Before Texting. Their main goal of “Life before Text is [to] aid in blocking incoming and out going phone calls and text messages while driving a car. The aspiration of this tool is to keep all drivers out of harms way. No one should be texting or calling while driving unless it is an emergency. In this situation, Life before Text will allow a 9-1-1 emergency call in the event it is necessary. Any incoming texts and phone calls will show as a notification, the driver can then pull over, park and check and/or return the call or message.”
3. Must be someone I would want my son to look up to , and my daughter to marry.
NBC are investigating an edited clip of the 911 call made by George Zimmerman.
Which fills every moment,
to give a taste of the sorts of things well be carrying.
Step two, stop browsing all the aisles of the grocery store. Your new best friends are the areas around the aisles. Fresh produce, fresh meat, dairy. I do admit that when I first started my journey, I relied on frozen meals from Lean Cuisine, but they are full of sodium, but they did help me stay conscience of serving sizes. I was eating way more serving sizes than I was supposed to. It should have not been such an eye opener that you do not have to fill a giant plate with carbohydrates and meat to have a satisfying dinner, but sadly it was a huge eye opener. Read the packages carefully. Just making small cut backs in your cereal (did you know most people consume more cereal than they are supposed to every morning? A cup does not equal a bowl).
I do want to apologize for not updating sooner. I know people are praying and we are thankful.
X-Men Legends 2 – Rise of Apocalypse (Multi)
wood
* 2-1/2 cups all-purpose flour
I hang out with them because they’re lovely lads and I very much enjoy their company.
I was completely in love with her Spring/Summer 2006 collection and seem to have been affected again with her new Spring designs!
ALEX BRUMMER: JP Morgan Cazenove banker Ian Hannam mines his friends 05/04/12
Feel free to suggest more!
When I realized what I may have looked like, I let her know I was perfectly OK,
doubting my memory first, a personal talent, i wondered if i ever had cash to begin with. then i noticed a much appreciated local restaurant gift certificate was missing. this seemed to be more than a peculiar coincidence. i scanned the floor. and nothing.
THE THURSDAY THAT THWARTS OTHER THURSDAYS HAS ARRIVED!!
I have been living with my husband for nearly 25 years and totally get how marriage is not easy.
Some of my regular followers may remember that back in February I was a guest designer for the month over at Dude Time Doodles. I loved being a guest there and I really enjoyed the challenge of creating male themed cards. Well, I got an email a few days ago from the lovely Tammy asking me if I would like to join the team as a full time Dudette. I was certainly flattered and delighted that they wanted me to join the team and I immediately accepted.
No! I have a problem with people in the healing professions, who are supposed to have some compassion, hurting me and thinking that it's funny.
Every Tim Powers book that I’ve read has taken me several days to get through, not for lack of interest. Powers’ writing is simply too convoluted and intricate to wrap my mind around it in a few hours’ time.
to be inspired and maybe inspire someone else?
3. Popeye’s Rip’n Chick’n
And so, media gave its final verdict: “All is well”.
The major problem is not that we have 10 tails (losses) or 10 heads (wins) in a row. The trader could be executing her edge flawlessly and still experience a series of losses.
“I didn’t mean to,” she growled.
Since they never provided me with a satisfactory explanation, I therefore am publishing my suggested reply below in English translation. The original Norwegian text was published at the blog Snaphanen.
I am hoping to have something to show you next week.....but I might be buried under piles of laundry that need to be folded and put away, so don't hold your breath.
We are starting off with bare bones in this room; a twin bed, a low shelf unit from Ikea, and a TON of toys!!! But I think with some of the things I plan on pulling from other places in the house and repurposing we will have a pretty easy time carrying out my vision.
I honestly believe that my body was mourning the loss of my babies, even though my eyes and brain were telling me Gus and Jack were alive and maturing in the hospital. The impersonal whoosh-whoosh-whooshing of the double electric hospital grade breast pump was enough to extract the life-sustaining milk, but it was not enough to convince my empty chest and grieving heart that all was well.
From past experience, I know that my enjoyment of the Oscar ceremony (one of only two awards shows I bother with) is directly proportional tot he number of nominees I’ve seen. With that in mind, I took this weekend to start playing catch-up with the films that are available in Ottawa’s rep theatres.
No, I'm not talking about the upcoming Megastorm about to hit Seattle, but about SOPA and PIPA.
Published: 1:30 PM 04/02/2012
Arlene Kushner on The Toulouse Killer and Funeral BDS Fail: Intel builds high tech empire in Israel Hamas losing popularity, but… HR Comment: Time to End the Incitement Against Israel Rare Glimpse into the Ultimate Martial Arts: Krav Maga Instructors’ Course Old friends, defending home together Updates on India investigation on diplomat attacks
Two unopened, brand spankin' new
Pour in the crunchy potatoes. Add pepper to taste.
The bluebirds have been busy all morning creating a nest. The female started it with pine straw. She's almost finished because she's using soft dried grasses now. The male stops by the nest box every few minutes with something yummy to eat and to check her progress. If you look closely at picture 4, you can see the big fat grub in his mouth. I have never seen mate feeding behavior with bluebirds before although I see it frequently in cardinals.
Reid: not true we’re going to shut down the Internet
As I racked this off of the dry-hops, I took a taste. I'm not getting as potent an orange flavor. It's still a nice bitter though. Perhaps the aromas and flavors will pronounce more when cold and carbonated.
I am suddenly struck by the enormity of the task ahead of us, and of the impossibly high expectations that BHO faces. As the great philosopher Daniel Ash once said, when you're down, it's a long way up. And, of course, when you're up, it's a long way down.
The existing Yews are removed to make more room, especially for the common area between the center walk and the parking lot.
Now, I’ve noticed the trend for science fiction stories to end on an upnote before. The one most consistent thing I’ve gleaned from reading the Writers of the Future anthology is that the vast, vast majority of scifi stories end in victory of some kind – occasionally bittersweet, but consistently upbeat in some fashion. This note on my rejection letter left me wondering ‘is this a thing?’
“He may have, but I don’t think so. My uncle hasn’t shown any sines of knowing. And Rex wants me for himself, he wouldn’t jeopardize his courting me for even my uncle. It plays in our favor. After tomorrow it won’t mater any way.” Stuffing my hands in my pockets we walk out of the narrow space. My body still cooling.
Whatever my future, what I know right this minute is that my bitterness is disappearing and is being replaced with gratitude and confidence.
Patch 1.0.941.0 was deployed on Tuesday 24th April 2012.
1/2 lime, squeeze over salad
If you’re in the market to buy a new a home or refinance one, your timing is excellent.
Deep is one of the faces of the transformational India and it is an honour and a privilege to have him with us today. I welcome you Sir, as the Chief Guest of today’s occasion.
#54 Francesca
This was Case File #18...a beauty...
I created this piece a little at a time whenever the stress of the move really got to me. I'd bring a van load of tubs over to the new house, unpack the contents, then sit in my new studio and listen to the beads. It brought me such peace as I was making it.
He polishes the tool
Sometimes viewer discretion is advised, be I telling the truth or just writing lies.
FIRST things FIRSTLY:
Are you a morning person or a night owl?
I call out to all My children to listen. Your time on earth, as you know it, is drawing to an end.
Add 1/4 cup of the ketchup, the egg, parsley, Parmesan, Dijon, oregano, salt, pepper and cheese to the breadcrumb mixture. Stir well to combine. Add the ground sirloin and use your hands to gently mix until the ingredients are well combined. Don't overwork the meat. Divide the mixture into 6 equal portions, and shape each portion into a mini meatloaf on the prepared baking sheet. Each loaf should be about 4x2 inches. With the remaining ketchup, brush about 2 teaspoons over the top of each loaf.
I think first on the list with my free time will be to take a nap...but who am I kidding. You all know I won't actually do that. ;)
Did you think I was nice all the time? Sorry to burst your bubble.
This was one of the best films to be released in 2011. Director Martin Scorsese shows audiences two things: how beautiful true 3D can be and where the magic of movies originated. Though the former point will likely be lost for most on home video, it is still a stunning film. While not typically known for family friendly fair, the master behind the camera uses his skills to tell a lovely story about a lonely boy and an old man who feels obsolete. The first half of the narrative may seem slow to some, but once they begin to put together the pieces of the puzzle it’s impossible to look away. Sacha Baron Cohen turns in a surprisingly good performance as the quirky station inspector, barely recognizable and quite entertaining. Ben Kingsley is wonderful as Georges Méliès, bringing a hardness to the character which is replaced by a warm charisma.
Opposition lawmakers said the out-of-court settlement was a “scratch-your-back, you-scratch-mine” deal that would allow the former chairman of Malaysia Airlines (MAS) to further reduce an initial RM1.8 billion owed to state-owned debt restructuring firm Danaharta.
In The Gunslinger, we meet Roland, King’s antihero, and enter his world, a “world that has moved on.” We also learn of his quest to reach the Dark Tower, Roland’s obsessive goal that drives the entire series. The book is haunting and spare, and if you were only going to read one Dark Tower book, this would be the one. Just try not to continue, though, when you reach the end.
All along the route people came out to cheer us on throughout our 60 miles. Many of these people spent the whole weekend following our route and setting up cheering stations and supporting us. Many of these people have a very personal reason for supporting us.
BYOB Don’t’s
Her get yet, I bet.
It makes me want to gather more of these oral histories from our elders before they are lost. When the country celebrated the bicentennial Fourth of July, I found another old woman who was well over 100 years old. She had been five when the first centennial was celebrated. Now she was enjoying the second. I begged to interview her.
William comes back to Lasher's, where he is joined by Jane as well as Leo & Angelica. Monica has fallen asleep down on the staircase. Lasher recites a poem he wrote:
So at the last minute, as I whined about yet another year might be going by without camping, we just decided to do it. We dropped down the moolah and just got our butts in gear. I've always loved camping, and used to go all the time. Every summer as a kid, every summer as a teenager, pretty much up until I had Celeste. Then I was too apprehensive about camping with a little one, and I have a hard time leaving her with anyone, so now that she is old enough, we took her on her first camping trip. (This is funny, because as I write this I am having flashes of my baby brother crawling through the campsite because he was too little to walk.)
My kids are pretty little so the attractions and rides we go to are limited to just those that are appropriate for young ones. You won't be able to find a review about Space Mountain or Hollywood Towers. But I will tell you all about the Jungle Cruise and the Small World!
Liming (Michael) Gu, 34, Piscataway, N.J.
WALKING DISTANCE: 8 blocks
541360 Geophysical surveying & mapping services
Something to think about, this May Day.
James Stark – our resident Sandman Slim – now joins the ranks of down-in-the-mouth supernatural sleuths, anti-heroes and protectors, as they mope majestically around on my bookshelf.
He had been thinking, he wrote,
In a couple of weeks, she is going with V to visit another place this famous guy built, called Falling Water. We know we like falling water, from the faucet, hahameow!
Whisk in well
Why and when did we stop believing that? When did we decide that a full-colour world full of magic and courage and friendship and challenge was something that only happened in our dreams? When did we decide that nothing can be new or exciting or different? When did we start believing that adventures weren’t something we could really have?
But thanks to our friends Chip and Laura and their girls who did the exchange last year here at the same school, they knew what would mean that ‘we’ (Siena and Lucas) would be missing Halloween this year.
Will contribute to the research in the field of synaptic plasticity. Will perform a variety of techniques including molecular/cellular biology and biochemistry (western blotting, immunohistochemistry, PCR) and behavioral experiments focused on the novel exploration paradigm. Will be responsible for maintaining transgenic mouse lines (breeding, genotyping, colony maintenance) relevant to these studies. Capable of working independently, ability to multitask and must have good communication skills. Qualifications:
This was our first time at the Ice Wine Festival. Held in quaint Niagara-on-the-Lake, a charming 18th century village, local wineries and culinary institutes meet to host a wine and gourmet food tasting along the main street. It was C.O.L.D., but that didn't stop the masses from coming out and enjoying their favourite vino. Gabriel remarked that it felt like we were in Europe, where often, despite the nasty weather, people still venture out to the markets or the town squares. Some highlights of the afternoon included seeing the "World's Largest Wine Glass", and marveling at the amazing ice sculptures and ice bars that were created around the venue. This is definitely on my 'to-do' list for next winter!
Last year this time, actually a few months earlier as I was injured by this time, I was running roughly a 6 minute mile pace… which is probably what led to my injury. Too much too fast! Now I feel confident that my injuries are behind me, there is a little swelling in my knees, but, I am going to the Dr. Scholls booth to get some insoles to see if that helps cushion the blow. I’ll probably try those in my Asics shoes first, then in the Sauconys. And by the way, although these shoes are perfect, would it be too much to ask of a major shoe manufacturing company, to make more than one model of shoe in 4E?
While trailing I came up with this little poem.
-Lots of unusual recipes. Next up on my list to make is Lemon whole-wheat egg bread with nasturtium butter. Any cookbook that finds a use for edible flowers has a special place in my bookshelf (and heart).
In order to preserve the views to the rear yard, an open steel staircase drips down from the upper level, inviting visitors to come upstairs. The cantilevered treads are clad in solid walnut, matched to the kitchen cabinets. The stair leads past the double height glass wall, allowing one to take in the view of the minimalist landscape in the rear courtyard. At the top, the master suite moves into the rear yard. This private retreat features a generous open plan with free-standing closets and private balcony.
Two teaspoons Chinese rice wine or dry sherry
-Being in the Moby wrap facing out
But please, please no more skeevy snake dreams, ok? I like snakes. But I do not like dreams that involve a snake jumping (snakes don't jump, subconsious-- I expect better from you!) into my shorts and squiggling around. Particularly when the squiggliness is so realistic I wake up and still feel like I am being snake-tickled. (Edit: it's been pointed out to me that I may not have been too clear, here. My side. The snake was getting all squiggly and trying to wrap itself around my stomach and it was tickling my side. My side, my side, my side. I hope that clears up any misconceptions!) I especially don't need this sensation at 5:00 in the morning, because it's really hard to fall back to sleep after a dream like that.
“There’s been an accident. It’s your daughter.” These are the words no parent ever wants to hear.
Anna Coffin’s portrait, now in the Friends Historical Library of Swarthmore College, bears out what her daughter later said in tribute to the Quaker women of Nantucket: “Look at the heads of those women; they can mingle with men; they are not triflers; they have intelligent subjects of conversation” (Proceedings, Women’s Rights Convention, 1853, p. 65).
That all seems like a long time, and many choices, ago. Between then and now, there were fleeting bits of lives lived in Montana, Seattle, the Bering Sea, Anchorage and Berlin, before Czechoslovakia, and so on... Explaining exactly how I got to Brussels and my current job, which has nothing to do with the oceans, gets a bit complicated.
As part of the mega birthday party each year, loads of folks bring their second hand goods to the city parks, and sidewalks.
He said in the Commons that his officials’ study of the position last week showed that claims of border desk queues were exaggerated and the longest queue was at Terminal 5 at Heathrow last Friday, where non-EU passengers were forced to wait for 90 minutes. The queues were “significantly less” for EU and U.K. arrivals, he added.
Til next year our family is going to have a lot of stuff to do! My Goals are to learn how to drive a motorcycle. Get ready for college in the fall and work my tail off so we can afford the best bike for McGuire. Also a major goal for me is to lose the weight that I have gained in the last year and a half. So my wight loss goal is at least 20 pounds, if not more! I will be blogging on my progress throughout the summer :)
Queens Park Rangers 2 – 1 Arsenal
misskaypoh posted on Hardwarezone forum:
Series: (Terrytoons?)
The second advance that makes the findings applicable for consumer devices is the technology used to create the microchip.
If I am forced to walk the plank, my rawide will get all soggy! Will Momma get away with this? Can I convince her to throw Data in first? This adventure is not over yet … because I am Dennis the Vizsla, and I never give up!
Popcorn Pals CD-Rom
This pond is a dogs’ paradise on a warm day. I still cringe though when I see dogs in it, remembering an incident many years ago, when Ben had jumped in, he came out with blood dripping from a badly gashed paw, which had to be stitched.
Ghanem last year announced he was abandoning Gadhafi's regime to support the rebels who ultimately toppled the dictator. He was a former Libyan premier who last served as his country's oil minister until his 2011 defection.
Papers: PTI Shimmer, The Paper Patch, DCWV Glitter Cardstock Matstack for the punched snowflakes
The Vancouver Police Department might have avoided this ignominy if they’d studied the modus operandi of other crooked lawyers. We Africans remember the case of an American lawyer involved in diamond smuggling. He hired a local transvestite to pose as his wife so he could hide the gems in her empty bra cups. Fortunately, a drunk passenger reported the transvestite to a security guard after groping her tits and concluding she was carrying a bosom bomb. Even a drunkard knows what a woman’s breasts are supposed to feel like. The transvestite broke down under interrogation and confessed to everything, revealing that the lawyer had insisted on conjugal rights as part of the deal. These legal vultures will squeeze every last drop from a contract.
Their menu openly tells you that the Flat Liner Fries are deep fried in Pure Lard… and their television commercials and print ads tell you that the side effects from eating there may include: Sudden Weight Gain… Back Pain… Male Breast Growth… Loss of Sexual Function… Tooth Decay… Cirrhosis of the Liver… and Stroke.
I shook Miri’s hand and said, “You’re Separatists.”
"Transcendent."
Sweet Mother is updated daily. You can follow this happy blog by clicking the ‘follow’ button at the top right of the page.
A few weeks later we let Elijah tell the world the news we had just found out. A third child was on its way to our home. God is full of surprises!
Valuing money is a balance between understanding that it doesn’t come on trees and assuring your baby boy/girl who’s turned sixteen doesn’t go to school in hand-me-downs with moth holes. But when did keeping kids from the work force turn into a secure way to assure their asset into a community? When did sheltering become okay?
Its a question we get asked every day! Our phone agents, sellers in our 13 shops based in the heart in London and on our social media fourms.
- Shalini
Anything you need to pay attention? Always consider that you connect requester only to people you rely on. If you share content – think about value and relevance – don’t just share something.
I'm going to do something unusual today for this month's Insecure Writer's Group. I'm going to be positive. Now, don't worry, it won't last. I also won't be entirely positive (you, know, so you still recognize me) but I have to admit, I'm feeling pretty good.
Batman & Robin is a ridiculous, ugly, stupid movie. I've come to regard it with some amusement since Christopher Nolan repaired the damage done, but it's still a very acquired taste. In some ways, it's more bearable than Batman Forever - it can be amusing if enjoyed ironically - but not by much. Batman & Robin is one of the worst movies ever made.
Do you still write at all?
Riding north, the trail winds through the woods and reaches a low spot that apparently floods or gets waterlogged. A boardwalk was built to carry the trail, and being brand new, it is smooth as asphalt. No bumps or noisy loose boards here.
I was trying to live my life on this new theory, that "You only live once..." But hell, who wants to live a life full of bad decisions, simply because we're trying to be carefree? I know I'll find a happy medium.. I'm just wondering WHEN?!
DH has signed ex Doncaster Rovers, Charlton Athletic and Newport fullback Paul Robson ahead of the Carshalton Cup cruncher. Paul, 28 adept at left or right back, has played for Crystal Palace Baltimore, a feeder club for the real Crystal Palace FC, who he also spent time at Selhurst Park with and Long Island Rough riders; during a 6 year spell in the USA. He returned to the UK with Newport County this summer but a change of management saw him swept away with the new broom. This spells bad news for any chance of a first outing for Blackburn Rovers Matt Pearson and confirms that Tony Sinclair is likely to be out for a while.
Generally, Gianni is a likeable fellow, and his mother is the exact opposite. All of the beauties in between are quite pleasing to the eye.
During the full moon this week, I heard that the moon would be the closest it ever gets to the earth. They were calling it a Super Moon. I found that to be inspiring and went out to take some pictures. I love photographing the moon!
Heat a grill pan over medium-high heat. Drizzle the oil over the eggplant, zucchini, and onion slices, then sprinkle with salt and pepper. Working in batches, grill the eggplant, zucchini, and onions until they are tender and grill marks appear, about 4 minutes per side. Cool completely.
Someone tell me what the hype is with these Revlon Lip Butters!!! Are they worth picking up?
the property.
The third issue is what else the publisher has in the pipeline. They may only have a certain amount of marketing spend allocated to April and it all has to go to their star author who’s publishing then. Or they may wish to avoid publishing your book at the same time as another one that has turned out to be rather similar in theme.
Here are some of the ideas I love. Don’t forget to link yours up at the bottom!
I Walked Today Where Ancients Walked.
This blog’s post yesterday calling local hackers not to engage in hacking Chinese sites because of possible instigation on the notorious Chinese hackers was met with adverse comments from pro-hacking individuals. As a result, the said article–”Pinoy Hackers Retaliate, Deface some Chinese Sites” has been visited by a thousand times since yesterday.
Take the 2 wards my local party targeted as an example, in Great Barr with Yew Tree Labour polled 1,831 votes in 2011 but 1549 votes in 2012 whereas we polled 950 votes in 2011 and 866 votes in 2012. The fact that we had a very popular and competent sitting councillor in Sadie Smith standing in 2012 meant that our votes were probably a lot higher than they would have been had someone else stood. An example is our other target ward Newton where Labour’s vote reduced from 1,787 in 2011 to 1483 in 2012 whereas ours reduced from 1,048 in 2011 to 519 in 2012 despite an excellent and motivated local candidate and a significantly increased campaign effort compared to 2011.
Despite the misconception that all of South America is beaches and rainforest, people may be surprised to know that I keep a supply of winter hats, gloves, fleece jackets, and thermal underwear on hand in the event I go somewhere cold. Last weekend four other teachers and I joined a tour to the Parque Nacional Natural Puracé, which straddles the southern departments of Cauca and Huila.
The Price to Transform Culture
Good. Now, let me now return you to a more excited and confused state.
Book Trailer
I am very last Minute as i haven't written or posted any cards yet .. that's tomorrow's job lol
I simply can’t believe that only three years after the ‘dire predictions’ about the rise of Islamism have turned out to be false (if indeed that is the case), that Jason Burke can now argue that they were all somewhat misplaced. Burke’s historical perspective is clearly and evidently that of a journalist rather than that of a historian. Just because more terrible things haven’t happened within this very short three-year period, that is hardly a good reason to completely discount the warnings.
Sari made a pattern for a Snoopy house - complete with Snoopy on top but since she is TAKING DRIVERS ED (!!!!) this week she wasn't home to decorate it. She is doing it now and when it's done, I will put a picture up.
Funny story, though - Ms. Egan told how her own wallet had been stolen more times than she could recall, and had received a call from the credit card representative soon after her card was stolen. Ms. Egan shared more information with the woman only to learn that she was, in fact, the thief herself.
First, these audiences are precisely the ones that most need to be shown that poetry — and for that matter, literature, self-expression, black identity and life in general — exist outside of a hip hop vacuum. Using a rapper, even a backpack rapper, as the means of reaching out to these audiences only reinforces the very provincialism the White House is supposedly seeking to counter.
I love fun little love notes. They are some of my favorite things to make and share. And one of my favorite things to do for my husband. It is, once again, another example of how something so small and easy can completely turn a regular day into a fantastic day.
I congratulated myself on being well out of it. After all I was a working mother - most unusually in the world of expat wives. I had enough on my plate with my exceptionally cool job in the glamorous world of international photojournalism. Or so I told myself…and anyone who asked why I wasn’t in a Book Club.
Noon-2:30pm
(Jan 5) There were three large grass fires fed by winds as strong as 117 kilometres an hour in Alberta, Canada. (Source)
She gave a friendly smile and “Sir I’ll just take your bag”
war with china within two weeks if war faction can swing it (via Philippines’ island flare-up) . Russia is the balance of force; if Russia goes with insane WW3 U.S. faction (Russian force amassed on Iran border may also be deployable to China); war faction claims China is sending nukes toward U.S. a la October 1962. The Chinese are allegedly doing so because they have no faith in the US dollar, or returns on their bonds.
I'm glad you noticed that..
I think mine are definitely apples, although watermelon comes very close, but then I also really love nectarines and blackberries and sour cherries... yum
Easy, isn't it??
The MDC's dilemma is that if it walks away from the SADC deal it will leave ordinary Zimbabweans naked in a blizzard that will offer only death or flight.
So, why all the fuss? And how did this relatively benign group merit a headline like this in the Huffington Post: “Truth4Time, Secret Religious Right Facebook Group, Included NOM Co-Founder, Fox News Pundit And More”? (To the credit of the editor in the Huffpost HATER/Fag Voices section, he responded to Michel Brown immediately when he raised concerns about the factual content of the article, he was courteous and helpful from first to last, and he posted Michael Brown corrections within the text of the article itself.)
“The Church in the United States should lead the entire Church in the world” in a revitalization effort, Archbishop Carlo Maria Vigano said. “This is a great task, but you have the determination and the grace to do it. This I know is the vision of the Holy Father regarding the Church in the United States.”
Yes, we accept unsoliciteds and every one we receive is read. As with most agencies, we post specific submission guidelines on our website and I would urge that you follow these carefully for every submission you make. At present we only accept hard copy post submissions; we get too many unsolicited emails to make sure they are dealt with efficiently.
"A striking, pitch-perfect, wonderfully atmospheric and beautifully written ensemble piece that subtly portrays a society on the brink of moral collapse."-Sunday Telegraph (UK )
In January of 1923, a white woman reports an attack by a Black man she can’t identify, but the sheriff apprehends one Black man and a posse of white vigilantes apprehend and kill another.
Rev. Neale was mauled at the funeral of one of his Sisters and he was threatened on other occasions with stoning and people who wanted to burn down his house. In the end, he and his Sisters survived and thrived, living on to do good deeds.
I remove my hat and shuffle my hands through my hair. The breeze is nice.
But most importantly, remember what those bastards did to us:
and a little of this, too.
you were about to enter.
With Skin Color: Farmer
It was an extremely anxiety-filled few months for me, as we tried to figure out the best route to take in moving to a new state - to rent or to buy. Every month we took trips up there to meet with realtors and to see our options. We finally found my dream home. It was a 200 year home on nearly 6 acres on waterfront. Pure heaven! It has been my fantasy for several years to buy an antique home and to restore it, and this house was absolutely perfect for that. It ended up taking well over a month of negotiating and going through times where we had to step back and try to figure out if we were even comfortable buying a home since my husband is just starting up his own business. But, FINALLY, in the end, it worked out and we bought the place! I cannot even explain the relief that it's all just over with and done.
I have decided that, for the most part, I would step back and allow the Justice system to work in the case of Trayvon Martin. There has been too much misinformation and spin from both sides in the case. Luckily I didn't jump to conclusions earlier on.... but waited instead for more information before forming an opinion. Now that more information has come to light... I still believe that Zimmerman was the instigator and has most of the responsibility for the outcome.
Following the My Lai massacre in the late 1960s during the Vietnam War, when US troops unable to distinguish friend from foe slaughtered all the villagers in My Lai, the Batang Kali incident was revisited by British newspaper The People. Then British Secretary of State for Defence (from 1964 to 1970) Denis Healey set up a team to investigate the incident. But the case was soon dropped for “lack of evidence”, despite statements made from former members of the patrol that made it clear they had been ordered to lie about the killings during the 1949 investigation.
So the big issue facing next gen is development costs and profits. This week I have been following ways to deal with these issues. In this article I am looking at used sales, used sales are driving retail costs higher. Now I’ve looked at two ways of curbing used sales, but all methods to curb used sales by publishers would hurt them. Retailers would retaliate hard. But what if it was the retailer themselves that solved the issue?
Anthony Hopkins as Odin gives an adequate performance as Odin, his role demonstrating once again that British actors of a certain vintage are always able to find roles as authority figures in American pictures.
Óttarr, the meeting of yourself and the band seems especially serendipitous – can you explain the magical events that made this unison happen…?
Jesus is the perfect atonement for my sin, and I cannot and will not decide which pieces of His perfect teaching I will accept. It all fits together, it all belongs to the same picture: God’s will for our lives.
Friday April 2
The New York Times did some digging and this is what they found:
Exposure to even tiny concentrations of the chemicals present in oil can also cause harmful biological effects that usually go unnoticed, according to a study published today in Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences.
I am going... to start making my rolls and a pumpkin pie. The kiddos and their Daddy need to crack the pecans we picked the other day so I can bake a pecan pie!
The 37-year-old denies two public order offences, one of them being racially or religiously aggravated, and faced trial.
Personal business really shouldn’t be discussed on the subway or shouted loudly on one’s mobile phone in the street.
I like to be able to kiss my horses on the lips and apparently Thoroughbreds aren't into that.
"Jasmine? What's happened?" Delphina gaped up at me, expecting me to have all the answers, as she always did. There was a vivid red line on her cheek where the petal had sliced her skin.
It sure as fuck wasn't moralitythat got me interested.
Smug in the fact that it is they, not Iran,
Palette onto the biscuits and decorate with green, white and orange jellies
In his first report, published last year, he said FTSE 100 companies should reach a minimum target of 25 per cent of female representation on the board by 2015. But he rejected the option of setting quotas, which exist in countries such as Norway.
Envision just unplugging your mower from the wall outlet and turning it on. That’s it. No will need to fill up the tank with gas. No have to have to be concerned about spilling oil and there won’t be any trouble starting the motor.
Wendy: What is it like in the chrysalis?
"The rationale would be blight?" I asked.
It's hard to think that while taking that picture I was 19wks pregnant. I almost feel stupid for being so blissfully ignorant. I would have talked to Avery, Trinity, and Langston more. I would have rubbed my belly more, I wouldn't have complained about the foot lodged under my ribs.
- Melodi Festivalen in Sweden
Home tours are an illusion.
From the very beginning, I've always believed there to be some kind of connection between Jill and Christina. Her birth was a miracle, her survival was a miracle, and I've always felt as though Jill had a hand in that somehow.
2.) Power to resurrect the dead.
I see lots of "crystal" (look-a-likes and the real deal) out at thrift stores, too, but I thought this little cup was special because of its arms on the sides. It'll be sweet to put flowers in, in the springtime (flowers in little cups remind me of my mom and my Mimi - they both always had little tiny bud vases with flowers all over the house, growing up), and I think it's cute as a standalone object on my bookshelves for now!
The child was brought to a Dallas hospital in April 2001 with a skull fracture and bruises to his head, thigh and abdomen. A week later, he was taken off life support and died. Hernandez’s DNA was found in Karlos’ blood on a pillowcase and on the child’s clothing.
Saturday night and it’s just me, the dog and DOGTV
bay leaf
William Landay kept my attention throughout the book. I could hardly put it down, even knowing that the ending might not be as pleasant as I hoped. He keeps the emotional roller coaster going, as he details how Jacob’s father does all he can to defend his son. In this novel, Landay has told a story that could apply to many fathers who, like Andy, would be willing to do whatever it takes to keep their children safe and free.
2/3 cup sour cream
Some nearby students giggled, including Taylor.
The forecast promised rain that never came all week, until this evening. It makes me feel better. The sky trying to wipe away all the grime and heaviness of life. Trying to grow our garden and flowers, make our grass green. BUT mostly I am glad for the rain because is soothes my soul. I feel calmer, like I can breathe.
"The reason there is no punitive damage for breach of contract is that it is a financial issue only. We have attached some kind of shame to it. But then, you have to ask, 'shame in whose eyes?'"
Middle Left - The texture on this canvas was made by adding inclusions. Beads and other bits were stuck to the canvas then strips of tissue were applied over the beads and stuck on with multi medium. Then dry Distress inks were just brushed on and the tops of the beads were rubbed with a baby wipe to remove the ink.
Ran across this insightful quote on twitter today …
Kwik Sew 3504 is currently for sale at Fabric.com where, when last I checked, they had 4 in stock. They've told me they will reorder when they're down to 2, and that it takes 3-4 weeks for them to receive another shipment.
It secures us against interruption.
So there you have it. My thoughts however muddy they may be. Again, CONGRATS to all the finishers, THANKS to the organizers, and WELCOME to my new followers (I have done a jig in honor of each of you) I hope you enjoyed your April 2012 tour of Newfoundland.
Upon awaking in the morning, my son Tao and I head up to the dam where we do our sungazing and walk the dogs. Because we are in a mountain kingdom by the time the earth spins sufficiently for the sun to be visible it is already quite intense. It starts off as a strip of light around the mountain and gradually exposes its full beauty and majesty. The dam full for now due to winter rains, is either still beyond belief or raging with its own patterns.
Oriental Daily quoted an anonymous political analyst as saying that the outburst by Singaporeans against Sun Xu’s remarks is a result of ‘years of pent-up frustrations at the government’s immigration and education policies as well as the recent influx of large numbers of immigrants from mainland China which makes such conflicts inevitable.’
On this sheet I list how many are needed of each part, and the sizes needed. This way when I go to my stack of wood I can figure out how much to prepare.
When I started, I knew if I was really going to go for something big like 13.25 miles I needed the right gear. Here are my must-have tools to becoming an avid runner. I can't stress enough how important these tools are to keeping yourself motivated. So please don't cheat yourself. If you start out with an inexpensive $40 pair of running shoes, some daisy dukes and unrealistic goals you will give it up. Gauranteed. For what it's worth here's what works for me.
The book isn't scary, though it is creepy. My favorite chapters were also my least (if that makes any sense at all)--when Jake (George) spends a few months in the small town of Derry, Maine. King paints the portrait of a dark town full of secrets and tragedy, and it haunted me well after the section was over. Still, creepy* as it was, it was also my favorite part because it felt so real. That's where I personally saw King's brilliance on full display.
May will be busy month on our blog, we're in alot of blog tours so keep an eye out for those and some awesome giveaways.
I’ve never liked when episode titles are made public – either on screen or now on your cable, satellite, or DVR menus. There is the chance they could give away the plot. When we write our episodes we’re always conscious of this and purposely assign titles that are vague. Of course the network promos then pretty much kill any plot points so who cares what the title is?
And now, I’m back and it’s good to be back… Well recently, I just celebrated my sixteenth birthday last March 18. It’s disappointing not to celebrate it here with you. But gladly, I celebrated the day with my loved ones.
But even if God is the proper person to whom sins ought to be confessed, has He power to carry out his judgments — that is, if He forgives, can He effect His pardon, and defend, clear, and cleanse the one confessing? The answer can be a blanket “yes” only if God is almighty.
So why was this film so awesome? There were many elements, going to see the film with friends who mutually appreciated the Marvel Universe did help. Seeing the overweight nerd men with bald heads and their Captain America and Thor paraphernalia did make me feel at home, of course I’m nothing like them (I was wearing an Iron Man t-shirt). The question of ‘who’s your favourite?’ came up. There is something about ensemble films that are immensely attractive to the public consciousness, I suppose that is why so many people enjoy films such as The Godfather.
In actual fact, the twang of spiced Bramley's and the deep red hue make this a viable alternative to a Christmas pudding, or a formidable rival for a freshly baked blackberry and apple pie.
marinated with ginger (I put 2 inches worth, chopped up)
I've lived though a lot of scary stuff. I can cope with all of the above. I know it, because I've experienced much, much worse. So - shame, misery, derision, embarrassment, pity, envy - bring it on. I think I'm ready.
nee 'k zoe liegen, zes matrozen me nen board
That is what is waiting for us. That is what is waiting at the end of our YAWP's expression. And isn't that incredible? It's waiting for YOU. Don't be afraid of it. Stand up and yell it, for it is what you were meant to do and be.
A teenage girl with a choice to make
without doubt he will perish everlastingly.
I thought I might be able to find that time in the evening after my mom goes to bed. Guess what? She refuses to go to bed until I go to bed (yes, we've tried tricking her but she figured us out - LOL) and when she finally goes to bed I'm exhausted. I'm an early riser so I've considered enjoying 'me time' in the early morning hours but then Cooper is demanding my time. aarrgghhh! LOL
Being part of The Buddy Beat has helped people increase their self-belief and build their self-confidence. Some have taken up drama, one volunteers on the radio for RNIB, another saw her creativity reawakened which give her the impetus to start her own art group. Everyone has benefited from the group and the fact that many are long term members is testament to the addictive and healing power of the music. “We are a close knit group but at the same time we are very welcoming to new members and many of them stay with us when they see the caring and fun that goes on.”
But let me back up…
nor storms, nor powers, not even God
The HTC One XL boasts a fantastic 4.7 inch screen that is packed with pixels (1280×720) to offer a clarity that will blow you away. HTC has developed a camera package that is so good you may need to remind yourself this is a phone. The images captured truly shine with an 8 megapixel resolution and the camera easily handles low light situations well. Always Focus and Continuous Shooting means you will never miss that shot again and with Android 4.0 you can even take a picture while shooting high-definition video. Beats Audio enhances the music side of things and now you can enjoy the clarity of sound that the artist hears in the recording studio. The One XL has a 3.5mm audio jack for when you need to listen to your media in private.
I was sitting at one of our local hot spots parked along the curb out in plain view watching the morning salmon run (commute). I see this car drive by me with a female holding her cell phone in her left hand, up to her left ear and was obviously having a conversation.
THE ARCHIVED, about a teenage girl who must return the restless, ghost-like Histories of the dead to their rightful place in a labyrinthine supernatural library known as the Archive; when more Histories begin to wake and escape, she must stop the doors between the worlds of the living and dead from breaking open, all without falling victim to a beguiling History who is more human – and more disarmingly attractive – than the others.
Nutritional tests have shown that animals raised “on pasture” (not in fattening cages) have significantly higher levels of fat soluble vitamins, as well as being higher in fatty acids Omega 3 and CLA, shown to improve heart health and prevent against autoimmune & inflammatory disorders, cancers, and weight gain (tis true!). I wanted those free range, organic chookies, dammit!
When a member of the audience went to the floor microphone during the question period to ask whether Dr. Cloward's strategy is a substitute for "Socialist organization of the proletariat, the industrial factory workers " Dr. Frances Piven of Columbia replied from the dais: "I really only want to make one point-the disruption of the system. Welfare rolls will begin to go up; welfare payments will begin to go up-the impact will be very, very sharp. The mounting welfare budget will increase taxes, force cities to turn to the federal government. We have to help people to make claims; for this they will organize and act."
It is one of the “drivers” of change in our life.
The month of June is in the heart of winter in South Africa. In the area where the conference takes place it can become quite cold during winter time, particularly in the evenings. Temperatures range from 8-21 degrees Celsius during the day to between 0-5 degrees at night. You are therefore advised to bring warm clothes, a raincoat and an umbrella as it can quite easily rain any time of day.
- Remove the mixture from the pan and place in a clean container. Leave to cool, then place in the fridge to chill for 2-3 hours
There is something deeply, hauntingly wrong with this picture.
Note: Sections of 4th Ave and Congress are under construction so plan your route accordingly.
Today is not the hottest, or warmest, or worst time to be alive, on this wonderful planet. It is arguably the best! The Vostok ice core shows our own interglacial, the Holocene, to be the most temperate, the most stable – like a comfy climactic nest, in fact.
When the law against sodomy was removed in Norway in 1972, the legalization of men having sex with men was accomplish. But the law against sex with animals were also removed. From 1972 to 2010 there was no law in Norway against having sex with an animal.
measurements are:
package of rod pretzels
- I'm still duckin & divin, you know me, Dirty Jude. And my mother, she's got herself involved with some holy hollers that pedal their madness down in Cornmarket.
That statement seemed so....sad. I told him that it sounded so sad. and asked why he would ever think something like that. his reply was this:
Haha, today I met Elina in centre and as we we're going to her place there was a funny scene in a bus. I was searching for my bus ticket in my bag and ofcourse I had forgotten it home and so I was like I don't have it with me. The driver was just that I could go without. In two stops, as we got to the end stop, Elina and I didn't leave the the bus cause we had to go in other direction back. So, the driver started yelling at us that this is the end stop, like we didn't know,duh, and that I should buy the ticket or I should leave and as we we're leaving she closed the doors right in front of us, like she just said we should leave. :D She was the most the irritating person ever.
There is nothing like bunting to signal party. Already in Regent Street, the Union Jack bunting is fluttering resplendent in the breeze as the spring blossom drifts like confetti from trees, all in splendid anticipation of the Royal Wedding. Not that the weather will need to be perfect – the only way that the British will be deterred from being outdoors on such an occasion will be a force 10 gale!
Have you ever woken in the night,
No, I wasn't using a fisheye lens - but by concentrating on this bauble, high up on a five-metre Christmas tree, I have managed to acquire a fisheye effect of everything above and behind me. What you see here is a very low-res image, so if you want to see the original full-size file, just click here to view it on my Red Bubble site.
Sundays, Maria said, are really boring because EVERYTHING is closed..restaurants, theatres, stores, everything. Basically there’s this huge lunch then siesta-ing all day.
"Yeah, I'm soooo sure buddy, solar storms effecting the power grid? That's impossible, well maybe not impossible but it's never going to happen. The government would never let that happen."
These recommendations will no doubt be cheered by insurance companies and the government (since Medicare, Medicaid and Obamacare make the government a de facto insurance company I’ll lump it together with the likes of Kaiser Permanente and Blue Cross for the rest of the article.) Insurance companies can now refuse to pay for these tests or at the least requiring doctors jump through time-consuming and money-losing hoops such as requiring pre-authorization to do them. The article claims that as much as 1/3 of the $2 trillion spent on health care in the USA is unnecessary, so imagine the savings to their bottom lines these companies will enjoy by cutting nearly $700 million from their payments. The problem with this figure is that it’s like the old saying about half of marketing dollars being wasted, but no one knows which half. Because it is impossible to accurately determine which person needs a test and which doesn’t it will be impossible to reap the savings hinted at in these recommendations.
The figures have just been published on library book borrowings for the year 2010-2011. Adult borrowing is down, but children's book borrowing is up. The total number of borrowings of children's books for that year was a staggering 96.8 million ... and that's in a country with a total population of about 60 million! That is surely encouraging. And the detail of the books and authors borrowed is, I think, equally surprising and positive. People borrow books very differently from the way that they buy books. Take a look at the list of the top four hundred most borrowed authors in that year - http://www.plr.uk.com/mediaCentre/mostBorrowedAuthors/top250Authors/2010-2011Top400Authors.pdf
The Washington Post had an article yesterday about a Capitol Hill house with an fab rooftop deck with views of the Capitol and Washington Monument. Being consumed with jealousy, I quickly started looking for my own rowhouse and found this cute little house. It's in a great location - just a few blocks from Pennsylvania Ave and Eastern Market and right on East Capitol St, which means that it should have a great view of the Capitol from its roof. Well, it might. It's a two-story house in a block of three-story houses. But the Italiante style is just so charming that I'm going to pretend that there's a view.
But one source close to Wiz tells TMZ … “Wiz has never heard of this guy … it’s just a plot that happens all the the time to rappers to get money. This is just some no-name rapper who wants to get paid.”
I had the honor of being a guest writer over at WomenWellLoved, Katina’s insightful & lovely blog. Single or Paired-off: It’s Time to Get Engaged.
On Sarah Palin’s last presidential run:
In April, we took a short trip to Austin for a special wedding. We took Bella with us, but it still seemed like a lazy vacation only having to take care of the baby! It was in the 90's when we were there, that is my kind of weather. :o)
Our friends have asked about a memorial for her. Katie thought that a gift to the Thoroughbred Retirement Foundation program in Kentucky would be best. They find homes for retired race horses…the ones that didn’t bring in the big bucks and are often discarded without care. Connie loved horses and we’ll think of her every time our big beasts run across the front pasture.
RECIPES COMING SOON..ET VOILA..:)
This book is about a dystopian society in which vampires run the society. Upon reading The Immortal Rules by Julie Kagawa, I had thought this was an original idea, but both Julia Kagawa and Andrew Fukuda managed to write different stories that captivated me and kept me on the edge of my seats, despite sounding similar—the books are extremely different and I
As we left (there were three of us) we decided we would help her raise an endowment fund for her school. I am a novice at this, the thought TOTALLY overwhelmed me. The other two ladies are pretty seasoned pros. I think the Lord knew we were committed. After making that commitment the first of many miracles happened.
My forum for writing just disappeared when I took early retirement on April 13 – a Friday, no less. So I decided to create my own forum through a blog. I’ll probably cover my life as a retiree and where I’m headed with free-lance writing and photography. And since I love journalism and newspapers – I’ve spent 34 years in the industry – I’ll add my two cents worth when it comes to the direction the industry is taking. The one thing I know now is that I want to continue to receive a newspaper. I like the way it feels and the way it smells. I want to be able to fold it and cut stories out.
Can you say holy guacamole?
I printed the 8 bazillion photos that we took that week and am in the process of creating an album.
And hath put all things under his feet, and gave him to be the head over all things to the church, Which is his body, the fulness of him that filleth all in all. Ephesians 1:22-23 (KJV)
Now, it has taken me alot of years and alot of trial & error to find what works for me specifically - cause every persons pain tolerance levels are NOT the same (although I've had an actual 'Dr.' try & convince me that I shouldn't be in as much pain as someone 'older' than me-???, uh ok...)
I was going to Photoshop the outlet out of the picture, but I wanted you to see how large the vinyl design is. :) I love how versatile the eCal software is! I thought you might want to try out this design, so I've added the svg file to the freebies section of my website. Feel free to download for free HERE.
don’t look ahead, there’s stormy weather
Didn't frost the cupcakes with lots of ganache. Just dipped the cupcakes when the ganache is still 'watery' and gave it a thin coat on top. My husband doesn't like too much frosting on cupcakes.
His eyes answer your song
Have any of you done weight loss wagers or contests with friends or co-workers? How has it gone? Did it motivate you? What was the outcome? I am all ears....comment away.
The end of the tunnel collapse in on me;
Level 4: MP Cost: 30, Duration: 40 seconds, 43% chance to not get knocked back.
CC#4 - due May 31st.
The cancellation of the contract is a first step in the process of resituating post-Mubarak Egypt’s relationship with Israel. While in Cairo recently, I asked a 21-year-old Al-Azhar University student, Mohammed, about his feelings towards Israel. “We have been in two wars,” he said. ‘They killed five of our border guards last year. Mubarak sold Israel the material to build the separation wall between Israel and the West Bank.’
You may remember me mentioning before that my sister is getting married this summer. This weekend we had an appointment in Lafayette to pick our bridesmaids dresses. She wanted all of our dresses to be different styles. They all had to be short, satin, and the color mercury, but other than that we were free to pick whatever.
Portland, OR 97210
I'm always so emberassed when I make a point to eat 100% clean, because it reminds me of how much better I feel inside & out if I avoid the junk food. I kick myself for slipping back into old ways. Sure, convenience food is convenient - but in the long run, it is so much work to get back into a healthy routine again!
He is in his mid-50s, 6’2, blue eyed, white bearded; jutting jaw and carved cheeks, lean-waist. He has a full head of wavy graying hair, nautically coiffed for an ocean going, salt-flecked sailing.
The thing is, it's not dreams of riches or luxury or of an easy life, or of fame or power that are coming true. It's a very simple dream, one that we all share.
Next came Liz - with another stunner. My, you girls are bringing some fabulous makes to the playground! You can see it here - what a beauty don't you think? One of the challenges Liz made it for was to have 10 elements on the card - and Liz achieved this without it looking over the top - so elegant Liz! The clever part I think was to stick to shades of the same colour - mine would just end up looking as if some one had been fighting in a paint shop!
In this card the figure wears a suit of yellow, that’s the colour of mental activity. It seems to indicate that you have been thinking about things, giving a great deal of mental energy to this, but also note he wears a cloak of soft purple and that shows me that you have an awareness of this.
An article I read explained why some plants have red leaves on top. It’s a way to protect the plants from the effects of too bright sunlight. This colour red is so beautiful. I boiled two handful of those leaves until the water had become red and painted with this ink. It dries very, very slow, in different shades and I’ve used several layers to get this intense colour.
I also rambled horribly in many posts. Some don't make sense. When I was feeling lazy or too busy, I didn't post a lot of detail. This is a blog, not a doctorate dissertation!
You made me feel like there is new hope and because of that I can now look forward to some happy twilight years because of your sensible, expert advice and international leadership.
This resulted in crimes like hijackings to be reduced to ordinary car theft, violent house invasions were recorded as burglaries, while murders were ascribed either to “death by natural causes” or “accidental deaths”.
Work. As I mentioned before, there are many things I need to learn and get into the groove with. I'm asking for guidance, wisdom, patience (for me and for my employers!), and just the ability to be a quick learner. Also, Jess is still working. She's still booking and emailing clients back in California. We ask for wisdom in how to handle the traveling involved.
Personalized background story – For every character that you create, it is possible for you to choose what type of personality your character has and that will determine the background story and how your character should feel like. Quite a good job here.
Holiday Inn (1942)
If you look at my browser right now, you'll see around 39 tabs. This is mostly your fault. You who post about interesting links that I just have to check out, you who write a brilliant post that I read in Google Reader but that I then have to open in another tab to comment on, you who suggest that book or that movie that I need to go and read about. I also have interesting articles or ideas that I think may the basis for a good post here, my Flickr page, where I've been planning to add some photos for weeks... I think you get the idea.
So yes, March is flying by for us.
nuclear materials for malicious
Why yes, actually. Enter, the two-in-one dessert dream bar. Part cool, creamy cheesecake. Part tangy, gooey lemon bar. All atop a crumbly, buttery pastry crust, this is TWO desserts, cleverly and deliciously disguised as ONE. So you feel like you're pigging out, when in reality, you're staying quite human. And at just 140 calories, it comes with a much appreciated side of self-control, too.
Today I have two sunrise photo’s. One just before the sun was up and the next one is showing the sun in full glory.
Karla, this is how I see it: This time, the wall you're scaling is called cancer. You've been thinking this through for a few weeks now, mulling it over, thinking about how success will be accomplished. Now the plan is in place for this wall. Every time you think about it, you go back over the basics, step by step, in your mind: The wall is high, but not that high. And the window on the second floor, well, it stays open all the time. It might be tricky, that leap from wall to window sill, but all you have to do is grab it and hang on. Your friends will be there to pull you in the rest of the way.
This has been a theme of Obama’s presidency from the start. A couple of days before his inauguration,Obama proclaimed: “What is required is a new declaration of independence, not just in our nation, but in our own lives — from ideology and small thinking, prejudice and bigotry” (an odd pronouncement, given that “bigoted” America had just elected its first black president).
I forgive myself that I haven’t accepted and allowed myself to see that when I am trying to convince someone to apply something that myself yet haven’t applying is me trying to push myself into action by first making others do it within the believe that i will follow
The lyrics to their songs are captivating. Again, they do have a dark/gothic edge to their sound. They sing about dark journeys, relationships, and interior thoughts. They have a good balance of songs that make me dance, to songs that I just need to relax and listen to. They definitely shake up the typical song structure. Sarah’s voice is very sweet, thick with her British accent, but very ironic to their lyrics, which I love. Their style is really fun and cool. You can catch Sarah with a neat glamorous hairdo like above, to bed head punk. The boys have their signature hair styles, being playful with what they wear as well. Check out my favorite The Good Natured music videos below.
Now, I’m not talking about my relationship status at all. I am not writing this because I’m single. That has nothing to do with why what she wrote is important to me right now. Remove the last few words though and it echoed perfectly to me.
2 onions
Video Boy was desperate to go on a Segway tour, but you have to be 12 or over, so poor Wombat Girl would have missed out - next visit, we promise!
Q: Other than your own, what is your current favorite zombie book?
“I don’t have much time, please ” she looked pleadingly at him.
or whatever else you wish...and dig in!
Several audience members have tentatively voiced their concerns, and even more have openly decried Jackson’s decision. It’s too crisp, too bright. Monty Cristo, however, described the preview in a slightly more positive light. “The cinematic filter between the action and the audience is dissolved in favor of a more immediate lens on the world of the movie,” he said.
If you just stay at the bottom you can stay in the fiction of the natural scene. Well, even there you have to try and ignore the cut stones and all the cables for the lights and suchlike. But you can do it. Go up the path, and all the artifice of the scene is laid bare. It’s like Disneyland.
Head to heels, your baby now measures about 13 1/2 inches. Her weight — a pound and a half — isn't much more than an average rutabaga, but she's beginning to exchange her long, lean look for some baby fat. As she does, her wrinkled skin will begin to smooth out and she'll start to look more and more like a newborn. She's also growing more hair — and if you could see it, you'd now be able to discern its color and texture.
“Are you going to pay for it, or just put your dirty gypsy fingers all over it?” the merchant sneers before taking a long swig from a jug. The smell drifts over on the afternoon breeze and I get a nostril full of cheap wine and unwashed skin. He wipes his mouth with a dirty sleeve. “Clear off, little whore!”
and we certainly have enough love to share.
Birmingham, MI 48009
Quick post today...Other details on this card, heart border die from Sweet 'n Sassy and hello sentiment from Paper Smooches! Oh and the background of this card is Core-di-nations cardstock, which has a colored core that is revealed when sanded. I embossed the cardstock first and then sanded the raised edges to reveal the teal core...neat, huh?
“Trevor and Curtis have focused on studying the market so Atmosphere Interior Design is in touch with reliable resources of sophisticated, classic, traditional and contemporary design, sourcing furniture and design materials and products from around the world”. – Atmosphere
splash of non-dairy milk or water (use enough to help the dough come together)
The winner of the contest can accept all of it or just the parts that they need or want.
I finally realize that to Kira, I've been talking about ansisters for maybe twenty minutes.
Saturday was a brew day at MB. First, Justin and I transferred the Rising Sun Ginger-Sesame Red Ale to secondary. So far, so good. Very tasty right out of Primary. Lots of roasty sesame-ness, w/ some fruity esters from the yeast intermingling with the pungent ginger, then a nice bitterness at the end. A hint of sour from somewhere, but I think it was a flavor made by the ginger and the hops. To this lovely concoction, and after much debate, Justin and I kept to our written recipe and added 4 oz. of candied ginger which was boiled for 3 minutes to sanitize and remove the sugar coating. We're assuming that this will add some goodness to the nose and little, if any, taste profile. We shall see soon.
. Remember the old film “Funny Girl”. Poker players, seated in a debtors’ prison, whose property has been sold at auction, said his mistress, who came to visit him:
But congrats, Scott. May there be many more hits against the Giants to come.
Plus, I have 2 new art pieces for my Etsy shop. I'm still going with the black, red, and cream theme with the help of my painted papers, and some ephemera that I found when I was cleaning.
Is accomplishing the Father’s will as high on your priority list as making sure that you don’t starve today? Do you place more emphasis on working for Christ than climbing the corporate ladder, watching the football game, or saving money for a vacation? Or, is “going to church” on Sundays the full extent of your current service?
Ronan
Socrates was Yannis Spathas and Antonis Tourkoyorgis on guitar and bass respectively. During the period that they were playing in the Kitarro Club they went through several drummers including George Trantalidis, all of them terrific. In Athens during the early seventies, when the 1967 military dictatorship was still in control, there were a number of rock clubs in the area around Victoria Square and in the Plaka. Poll and Morka played at the Elaterion. Socrates and Exidaktilo played at the Kitarro. As Dorian Kokas, the founder and leader of Morka told us one night "We used to race through our set and play everything fast so we could get out early and go to the Kittaro and catch the last set of Socrates." Musicians loved Socrates.
Here’s the paragraph I liked most in the article:
Martha Stewart punches
The Great Eastern Shipping Co. Ltd., Oil & Gas, Deals By Year, 2006 to YTD 2012 5
Below are some of the teachings and beliefs of these self styled apostles.
The last menu lets you save your creation, share it on Facebook or Twitter, delete it, or go back.
The lady and her husband behind me were more my age and also made small talk with me. We both agreed that we felt like little giddy girls on Christmas morning. What also made the time go by fast (other than my phone of course!) were the h'orderves the staff passed out. They were all from Giada's cookbook and quite delicious. They also passed out cold water, which was much needed on such a humid day.
They are not as crispy on the outside but are so quick and easy that I don't mind at all.
The winner will be announced on the blog, just before the sale on the 28th. We'll be sharing lots of sneak peeks of all our new goodies before that, so be sure to pop by every day.
Hmmm Cranberry Bread - actually cranberry orange bread.
The question is, "What is the importance of place?"
It’s impossible to find the cd players. You can find a whole square-mile of cds, but nothing to put them in and walk around with. Sure, you can get a big ass state-of-the-art, surround sound, 3000-disc changer equiped, forty-two speaker stereo system, but you can’t find a portable cd player. I finally folded and bought an MP3 player. It’s fine and dandy and can hold every song ever made in the history of music. It has a battery life of twenty three and a half minutes, but that’s a small price to pay to carry the entire world’s music library with you wherever you go.
So, instead of pulling your hair out, check out Khan Academy or one of the other sites listed below.
1 hemp
Sweet crib
6. Damage control: I put Mr Sunshine on this job. He basically went around making sure the activity stations were under control, nothing awful was happening etc. It wasn't an interesting job because nothing happened!
* Nearly half of the companies indicated that they are filing patent applications on less than half of the submitted invention disclosures.
For my entry I've gone for something a little different. Last year Gail and I went to some sports car racing at Donington Park, in Southern Derbyshire. The racing itself wasn't that exciting, but walking round the workshop and holding area was. There were people milling about, cars, trucks parked, spare parts, and all the other paraphernalia that goes with motor racing.
Thanks to this ruling, the only rule I would follow if I were a criminal is never to shoot at the police and not to resist arrest.
dripping down his face while his mouth
Hark the High Street Angels sing:
The term was coined by the British newspaper The Times in an editorial published on 19 April 1940, entitled "Quislings everywhere" after the Norwegian Vidkun Quisling, who assisted Nazi Germany as it conquered his own country so that he could rule the collaborationist Norwegian government himself. The Daily Mail picked up the term four days later, and the BBC then brought it into common use internationally.The Times' editorial asserted: "To writers, the word Quisling is a gift from the gods. If they had been ordered to invent a new word for traitor...they could hardly have hit upon a more brilliant combination of letters. Aurally it contrives to suggest something at once slippery and tortuous."
Raymond Colitt – Bloomberg, 02/27/2012
Atomic Anxiety: Next up is the multi-talented Ron Fortier, writer of novels, comics, and a play about World War II. What’s your story about, Ron?
This is the animal hospital to the stars. Glenn Close calls in with a question while I’m talking to the receptionist. “Oh, Chevy Chase, Joe Giradi, they all bring their pets here,” the woman tells me. “Luckily, they just usually send them in with a housekeeper or something or else there would be a commotion.”
My house stinks. God, it stinks. I know it's just pregnancy hormones, but first trimesters are like picking up dog shit: I have no idea why more people don't complain loudly and angrily about it on their blogs.
An early night is also long overdue but I have plans tonight (I’m having writing friends over) so an afternoon nap will have to make do.
When you play a game you want to sit down with your controller and run through a bunch of levels and beat down the boss at the end, it was pretty easy. You don’t want to get up and move your arms around in order to interact with the game, it is too much work. It also never works either, you end up trying to position yourself perfectly and the game never even detects your movements. Sorry Microsoft Kinect, PlayStation Move and Wii, it’s the truth.
Source : Osho Darshan Diaries
Or should we think about this issue from the perspective of addiction counselors and rephrase the question: Should we reward self-destructive behavior by providing more money to corrupt political elites in Greece?
Relaxing back in hotel room. Yes, that's prickly pear cactus juice in the pink drink. I'm seldom without my prickly.
I can’t thank them enough for my giving me life again
"Our Great great grandfathers called it the Sabbath. Our Grandfathers called it the Lord's Day. Our Fathers called it Sunday. And just call it the weekend."
I easily made my way back to Paris, but when I arrived it was pouring. After I soaked myself trying to find the Metro, I got smart and took a cab. The good news about the drenching rain is that it seemed to somehow "wash" Paris. It smelled less, looked less dirty. This was also helped by the arrival of much cooler weather that evening that persisted over the rest of my stay.
Roshon - Has been practicing MJ moves infront of a mirror and adoring familiy members since he was 3. Now, he gets to do those same moves on stage and call it ‘ballroom’. I was pretty ticked about Roshon being a member of this cast from the start – he dances. But what really grinds my chops is when stars with previous experience a) pretend it means nothing in this competition and/or b) put every move they know into their dances, no matter what the style is.
She is great friends with Blackie, the farm cat and it is only a matter of time before he joins her on the bench!
That kind of thinking led to our escalated involvement in Vietnam. Yes, I know there was a Cold War going on ... but after Korea we should have known better to avoid a land war in Asia. I can't believe that Nixon would have made the same mistake in the early 1960s. Ironically, Nixon's later not extricating us fast enough from Vietnam led to his domestic downfall in the 1970s. LBJ deserves most of the blame here -- he escalated Vietnam greatly in 1964 -1967 for domestic political reasons -- he feared a challenge from RFK for being too soft.
Take all your veg sitting in the bottom of your fridge waiting to be eaten – even that sad looking little parsnip (he just wants to be loved too) – peel and chop it up finely, either by hand if you have mad skills, or in a food processor, or with a food chopper like this one. {NB: you can add chili if you like it but that’s up to you!)}
A couple of weeks ago, on election day in fact, I met some real readers to talk about Wasted. It was the first time I'd met a Wasted reader (so to speak) and seen the whites of their eyes, so I was a little bit nervous. Also, they were teenagers and some younger kids, and young people are well-known for being very very honest. Sometimes too honest. But I needn't have worried. They were lovely and sparky and we had a great time.
I’ve done the same and accepted the extravagant gift that God has offered. A verse that will be familiar to many of you and that many of us learned growing up speaks of this gift. Probably even many of your children know it. It’s one of the things we used to whisper to our kids when we tucked them into bed.
We throw good fish away-oh
1999/2000 season, when he moved (June 1, 2000) to the Barbury Castle estate near Marlborough, Wiltshire, owned by one of his principal patrons, Nigel Bunter. King’s first win at the Cheltenham Festival came in 2004, when Fork Lightning won the Festival Trophy Handicap Chase. Among the best horses King has trained are Katchit (2007 Matalan Anniversary 4-Y-O Hurdle, 2007 JCB Triumph Hurdle, 2008 Champion Hurdle), Voy Por Ustedes (2008 & 2009 John Smith’s Melling Chase, 2006 Arkle Trophy, 2007 Queen Mother Champion Chase), My Way De Solzen (2006 Ladbrokes World Hurdle, 2007 Arkle Trophy, 2005 Long Walk Hurdle), Blazing Bailey (2008 Liverpool Hurdle, 2008
I had to laugh when I saw these potted shamrocks at Trader Joe's last week. They're awfully cute, but Trader Joe's made the mistake of including the botanical name for these shamrocks --oxalis. It reminded me we have oxalis growing in our yard for free. In this part of the country, oxalis is a weed. Is it in yours?
I'm not sure what my favorite tour story is. We were pulled over by the police for something my friend did at a Subway, so we convinced the cop we were a Christian band, and that they'd got the wrong van. Eventually they realized we weren't telling the truth, and put my friend in handcuffs, and we were band from a random Subway in, I think New Mexico.
Subsequently, look for the organization on search engines like yahoo for example Google. You will find lots of knowledge on them. When they have fooled folks previously, it is extremely probable it is undoubtedly a facts there. Do not just go from the testimonials on their site as they usually are imitation for those know.
About three weeks ago, Karla found a lump.
Football is different in every sense of the word. It is the only time I am at all interested in my Englishness, because I choose to and not because someone tells me to celebrate my Englishness. I shall watch every England game, and any others that look decent, like Brazil. I shall neck a skinfull of lout and appal the polite sensibilities of others shouting “Eng ger Land, Na Na Na. Eng ger Land, Vindaloo”
They get to pick their team here, but I’d like to see them go from 3 slots to 2. Let’s slot the Baldwin brothers in here, if for no other reason than the mental image of Stephen and William Baldwin trying to judge a literary prize.
Activists say the dam will flood more than 30,000 hectares of farmland, forcing around 5,000 people to relocate and severely affect fishermen across the Mekong basin.
Hello Everyone! I hope you're still hanging with me out there and continuing to read the blog. I feel like I was at a stand still for about a month with the up and down fluctuation of my weight but I think I'm heading back downhill now. I lost another 1lb this week. I still have not had a beer during the week or any pop at all. I still tried to taper off my carbs throughout the day. On Easter I still managed to eat small portions of the things I wanted but Monday we were at a funeral all day so I didn't have my normal structured eating and I ate Easter leftovers on Tuesday so that all contributed to my weight I think. Also it was a busy week so I didn't get much exercise. But nonetheless I am happy to be down 1lb.
Sarkozy urges networks not to show Merah videos; Al-Jazeera: ‘We’ll think about it’ AvitalLeibovich: As the #IDF prepares its bases for #Passover,we remember 10yrs. ago the muredering of 30 #Israelis by a suicide bomber. #IsraelRemembers AvitalLeibovich: The suicide bomber came from TulKarem,exploded in middle of Passover dinner in a hotel,killing 30 Isr. & wounding 150.#IsraelRemembers EoZ gets results! Turkish agency pulls Hitler shampoo ad Breaking: Shots fired at Assad motorcade The IDF’s first priority: The home front Israel’s deputy ambassador scolds J Street to stunned silence Honor Killing in Gaza The Middle East Media Sampler 3/17/2012: What J-Street Convention? Iran and Hamas agreeing to cooperate in case of war Safe belonging to Arafat found in Beirut and the best part is….
Nevertheless, we more or less overcame that (a large spare bedroom was unusable and packed to the gunwales* by the time we left our house in Lowestoft) and things were more-or-less reasonable for some time after we moved here, especially after we built an extension. It all fell apart after Weeza's wedding, when my hip started to give problems and I gradually became less able to keep things together. This is not an easy house and it has a large garden, and once darling Kenny couldn't manage any longer, the garden became too much for me. I lost heart, frankly, and the housework suffered too, and I left the Sage to his own devices. Devices and desires, dear friends. His collecting habit extended beyond control. He hasn't changed over the years, it's just that his brakes are not what they used to be and they were always poor. I did enough cleaning and tidying to get by and no more and ignored the rest.
No classes to teach yesterday + Wife out in the evening = Listening to a ton of podcasts! Here is what I heard:
Add a knob of butter to emulsify the mixture and add in the soba and toss thoroughly until the soba is well coated with garlic mushroom mixture.
UPDATE: I'm really annoyed, I must have set the timer incorrectly and the post didn't publish at the right time........ grrrrrr.
That’s how many local adults are milling about, living daily life with the kind of high blood pressure that paves the path for heart attacks, heart failure, stroke and kidney disease.
The first thing you should know is that "Bombay's Republic" is a delightful story, a story that, for me, fit all the requirements for that old cliché: a pleasure to read. I say that because this is not always true of Caine Prize nominees, or, to be honest, nominees for all sorts of literary awards — there can be, with some nominees, a certain sense of ... dutifulness. Stories dutifully written and dutifully read.
I enjoyed Morning Pages from the get-go, but it is only now, after several weeks of doing them, that I begin to see why they are part of The Artist's Way. They are unlocking my creativity and, more importantly, giving me time every day when I have pen and paper in hand and am ready to receive it.
a woman ‘in the snow
Tracey Pike, Choose to Wait Educator
Misty died on Wednesday, at the wise old age of 15. She was an apricot colored teacup poodle who was originally the constant companion and source of joy for my great aunt, Dorcas (definitely not a name you hear anymore!) When Dorcas passed, my mom took over care of Misty, but quickly realized that Misty needed more attention than she could give on a regular basis. When I moved to Terre Haute, I was working entirely from home and in a town fairly isolated from everyone I knew, so I decided to care for Misty and thought it would be a great way to get me out of the loft at least once a day. She definitely made walks in downtown Terre Haute a little more exciting as people giggled in delight when they saw her prancing down the street.
Do not try to control your children. Instead, listen to them, help them to learn the gospel, inspire them, and lead them toward eternal life. You are God’s agents in the care of children He has entrusted to you. Let His divine influence remain in your hearts as you teach and persuade. Elder Russell M. Nelson, Salvation and Exaltation, April 2008 Address
This is the point, he decided I was mentally, uh, challenged.
Laura and I are part of a writers group. About a year and a half ago, another member moved away and Laura went back to school so the group (which was only made up of four members) took a bit of a hiatus. At some point in the ensuing year, I decided to self-publish my children’s book and started moving slowly toward that goal. Later still, when Laura and I reconnected, I learned that her writing had veered off in an entirely new direction as well.
2010.09.18 Afghanistan Kunar 1 1 A voter and a woman are shot by Sunni terrorists at a polling station.
Take, for example, BP, one of the greatest perpetrators of ecocide on the planet. In October 2007, the Anchorage Daily News reported that BP agreed to pay $50 million for a felony Clean Air Act violation that killed 15 people and injured more than 170 people” in 2005 at a Texas refinery. The paper also reported that BP paid “$303 million in connection with price manipulation of the lower 48 propane market” and another $20 million on a federal misdemeanor for spilling “an estimated 201,000 gallons of oil” in “the largest oil spill ever on the North Slope” in March 2006. Add to BP’s criminal rap sheet the Gulf of Mexico Deep Water Horizon explosion, which took 11 human lives and created the largest marine oil spill in history, taking uncounted numbers of marine and avian life. Only multinational corporations and nation-states can avoid incarceration for murder and ecocide.
Churches - the buildings rather than the institutions - are of immense significance to our heritage,our national history. I am not, therefore suggesting that they be sold off to the highest bidder for redevelopment into shops, offices, clubs and hotels, but their use does need to be re-examined. Communist rule in Russia saw many former places of worship used as museums, party headquarters or whatever, but sadly this was usually done without much regard for history and what remained was a vandalised shell. Yet the principle was not so bad in itself. The French architect LeCorbusier used to say that "A house is a machine for living in". So, I would argue, God's house (if you must call it that) should also be lived in. There are Christians who already recognise that a stone built edifice is unnecessary to worship. Those who have inherited such an edifice need to consider whether they can afford to confine its use to its original purpose or whether they should have a more inclusive aganda, encouraging its use by those outside their religion
I put together this picnic in about 10 minutes.
In keeping with a long-standing tradition in civic architecture, this building incorporates many symbolic elements, but you’ll see no half-naked statues of Justice or carvings of fasces-bearing eagles here. Rather, the symbolism is more by way of suggestion, less blatant.
Ps...did anyone eat themselves into a 2-day food coma on Super Bowl Sunday because there were too many different types of dip and dip is one thing that forces you to throw all other cares out the window? No?...yeah me neither :/
Are we still talking about Lost? Yes we are.
Cut! – Anna Taborska
An example of how difficult it can be to challenge consumer perceptions is in the case of Coca-Cola in Saudi-Arabia. Coca-Cola has very low brand equity in this market for a very unique reason. Its early entry to the Israeli market in the 60’s precipitated complete rejection of the brand when initially attempting to penetrate the Saudi market in the 90’s.
It appears that I was wrong in these beliefs. And unlike Wendy Murphy, I’m willing to admit when I make a mistake.
53. Urban Cowboy (Debra Winger/John Travolta) – I love this soundtrack, I love Debra Winger. I am evidently a hick at heart.
Okay, enough of that, I'm off to check in with a few more of my WOYWW buddies ... I've a bit of catching up to do.
Day 3:
